已发布  9章

Chapter 10: The Cook (9)

Although Lin Dan had intentionally made extra food for dinner, everyone still didn’t get quite enough to eat. The main reason was the three burly men, who had enormous appetites and ate the rolled pancakes at an astonishing speed. While others had just finished one, they had already stuffed down three each, which was truly infuriating to watch.

Lin Dan, as usual, ate very little. Her cough worsened at night, so after taking her medicine, she crawled into the carriage to sleep. The rest of the group naturally lightened their movements, careful not to disturb her.

The three burly men found an open area to sit and keep watch over the caravan for the night. They seemed to be well accustomed to such a life of sleeping in the open. While everyone else in the caravan had already dozed off from exhaustion, they remained full of energy.

“No wonder Old Shen was so reluctant to part with Shopkeeper Lin when he left,” Luo Tietou said, lying on the ground and idly patting his stomach. “He even said that since Lin is sick, nothing tastes good to him anymore. Now I get it.” He smacked his lips and sighed. “That spring three-delicacy pancake was damn delicious! Too bad there wasn’t enough—I’m still not quite full.”

“Are you hungry again?” Zhao Liu asked, poking at the campfire with a wooden stick.

“I am,” Luo Tietou muttered as he turned over and smacked his lips. “I wonder what we’ll have for breakfast tomorrow. I still want more pancakes.”

Thinking about the taste of those pancakes, Zhao Liu secretly swallowed a mouthful of saliva. He also wanted more. Those pancakes were so fresh and flavorful—he could eat them every day for three months and never get tired of them.

“Enough. Get some sleep, I’ll keep watch,” the handsome and imposing man ordered in a low voice.

The leader's words were absolute, so Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou didn't argue and soon fell asleep. Not long after, the silence of the night was interrupted by the sound of stomachs growling, but luckily, everyone was already asleep and no one noticed.

The next morning, Lin Dan’s health had improved even more. Before dawn, she was already up, preparing breakfast for everyone. Seeing that their shopkeeper had risen early, the assistants naturally couldn’t laze around either. They got up one by one to fetch water and start the fire.

“You kept watch all night?” Lin Dan asked in mild surprise when she saw the handsome man sitting by the fire.

The man nodded. He opened his mouth as if to say something but then hesitated.

Lin Dan noticed his hesitation and took the initiative to ask, “Is something wrong?”

“No.” The man hesitated again, then finally couldn’t resist asking, “What’s for breakfast?”

Lin Dan chuckled. “I’ll cook a pot of white rice porridge, boil some noodles, and make a few side dishes. You can have porridge or noodles—whichever you prefer.”

The man nodded and said nothing more. However, the two burly men beside him had woken up and groaned, “Shopkeeper Lin, why aren’t we having pancakes? White porridge and noodles can’t compare to those delicious pancakes.”

Lin Dan shook her head with a smile. “No matter how good something is, you can’t eat it every day. It’s important to change flavors now and then.”

Shaoyao walked over, grinning. “Master, the dough is ready, and the porridge is simmering. You can start cooking the side dishes now.” Then she turned to Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou with a teasing smile. “You two really don’t know how lucky you are. My master can cook hundreds of different dishes without repeating a single one, and we’re barely able to taste them all. Yet here you are, complaining.”

“No complaints! No complaints! Whatever Shopkeeper Lin makes, we’ll eat,” the two burly men quickly backtracked under their leader’s glare. But deep down, they still longed for last night’s pancakes. White porridge and noodles—how could they compare to the taste of spring three-delicacy pancakes?

But soon, Shopkeeper Lin showed them with her actions that as long as the cook had real skill, even the simplest white porridge and noodles could become an extraordinary feast.

She took some preserved pork fat from a jar, chopped it finely, and stir-fried it in a pan. Then she added blanched Chinese toon shoots, dicing them and mixing them with the crispy pork fat. The juices from the toon shoots and the oil from the pork fat blended together, forming a thick and fragrant sauce. As the mixture simmered, bubbles popped, releasing bursts of rich aroma. Once the pork fat softened and the fragrance of the toon shoots was fully extracted, Lin Dan quickly added soy sauce, fine salt, and ground pepper, stirring everything together before taking it off the heat.

“It smells amazing!” Shaoyao and Dujuan carried away the bowl of sauce together, sniffing eagerly as they walked.

Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou, who originally had no interest in eating noodles, now found themselves struggling to keep their mouths from watering.

Still unsatisfied, Lin Dan steamed a large bowl of salted fish, made a cold salad with Indian aster, and took out some pickled vegetables from a jar, placing them neatly onto plates. Only then did she begin rolling and cutting the hand-stretched noodles. By the time the noodles were cooked, the porridge was also perfectly done. Everyone hurried to grab their bowls and chopsticks, eager to eat.

“Alright, dig in! The sooner we finish, the sooner we can get on the road,” Lin Dan said as she washed her hands and calmly lowered her sleeves.

The three burly men, being martial artists, were naturally fast eaters. In the blink of an eye, they had each scooped up three bowls of steaming hot noodles, mixed in the sauce, and started slurping them down. The combination of the rich, nutty toon shoots and the crispy, fragrant pork fat was absolutely irresistible. The tender freshness of the toon shoots perfectly balanced the crispy chewiness of the pork fat, creating an unbelievably delicious flavor.

The noodles themselves were incredibly springy, each strand absorbing the savory sauce completely. With just one bite, the soft yet chewy texture, combined with the rich, salty-sweet flavor, completely won over their taste buds.

Delicious—unbelievably delicious! The three of them widened their eyes in delight, speeding up their eating pace. Seeing them gobble up their food, the rest of the group naturally didn’t dare to lag behind. The camp soon filled with nothing but the sounds of eager slurping.

Still recovering from her illness, Lin Dan had little appetite and only drank a bowl of plain porridge before stopping.

The handsome man looked up at her with concern and asked, “Shopkeeper Lin, are you feeling unwell?”

“My health has improved a lot,” Lin Dan replied gently. “I’m just a little tired and want to rest in the carriage for a while. You all go ahead and eat—don’t mind me.”


The man carefully observed her. Seeing that her complexion was rosy and her eyes were bright—without any signs of worsening illness—he finally felt relieved.

Sitting beside him, Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou only slowed down their eating pace after finishing three bowls of noodles. Though they were already seventy percent full, they still scooped up a bowl of white porridge to cleanse their palate.

The porridge was just plain white porridge, without any particularly strong flavor—mild and bland when eaten alone. The two of them instinctively picked up some pickled vegetables and mixed them into the porridge. Taking a small sip, they were instantly amazed.

The pickled vegetables were made from finely chopped water celery, mixed with vinegar, sesame, and fennel. They had a crisp texture, a slightly rich sour and salty taste, but when paired with the mildly sweet white porridge, the flavor became perfectly balanced and incredibly fragrant. Drinking it slowly, they felt as if their whole body relaxed, with their stomachs feeling especially soothed.

Another dish served with the porridge was fermented black bean steamed salted fish. No one knew what secret technique Lin the shopkeeper had used, but the originally firm-textured salted fish had been steamed until it was tender and glutinous. The rich juices slowly seeped from the meat, blending with the aroma of the fermented black beans, making it utterly mouthwatering. Not only was the fish meat soft, but even the bones had turned tender—one could pick them up and chew them directly, with the flavor intensifying the more they chewed.

The salted fish was rich in taste, while the porridge was mild. Taking a bite of salted fish followed by a sip of porridge, the combination preserved both the sweetness of the rice and the savory depth of the fish—a perfect harmony of flavors.

Once they started eating, Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou couldn’t stop. They drank two large bowls of porridge before finally wiping their mouths with satisfaction. Seeing their frenzied eating, the tall and handsome man naturally wouldn’t miss out on the feast. Though he appeared elegant, he swiftly scooped up a bowl of porridge, grabbed a generous portion of pickled vegetables, and finished off the remaining salted fish. Still unsatisfied, he poured the fish sauce and fermented black beans into a bowl of noodles, slurping it all down.

Xiao Zhu was dumbfounded. He had never expected these three men to have such enormous appetites. It was fortunate that they hadn’t agreed to stay as guards, or else their caravan would have been eaten into bankruptcy.

“Damn, this is the life!” After breakfast, Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou lay on a large rock, rubbing their bellies with satisfied expressions.

“Rest for a while, then we’ll set off. We should reach the capital the day after tomorrow,” the tall and handsome man said. He still stood straight as a rod, his lean waist and abdomen as flat as ever, as if he hadn’t eaten at all.

“Got it!” The two burly men readily agreed. Just then, one of Lin the shopkeeper’s servants came running out of the forest, carrying two wild rabbits and a hazel grouse. Excitedly, he shouted, “Shopkeeper! The traps and nets we set last night caught some game. We’ve got lunch sorted!”

“What did you catch?” Lin Dan lifted the curtain of the carriage and, upon seeing the game, chuckled lightly. “Great, we’ll have braised rabbit and stir-fried hazel grouse for lunch. Hazel grouse meat is delicate and is known as the ‘dragon meat of the sky.’ No matter how it’s cooked, it’s always delicious. First, chop the grouse meat, young ginger, pickled chili, and preserved mustard greens into small pieces. Stir-fry them in sequence, then add half a bowl of clear broth and simmer briefly. This method keeps the grouse tender, allowing the marrow from the chopped bones to blend with the tangy, spicy broth. The dish doesn’t even need thickening—it’s already packed with flavor. Served with white rice, it’s an absolute delight.”

As Lin Dan described the dish, the recently full group found themselves swallowing hard once more, wishing time would pass faster so that noon would come sooner.

“Keep the rabbits and hazel grouse caged for now. Let’s get on the road,” Lin Dan said, turning to the three burly men with a gentle voice. “Brothers, this is where we part ways. Thank you for your care along the journey.”

“You’re too polite, Shopkeeper Lin.” Zhao Liu hurriedly swallowed his saliva, smiling awkwardly.

“Farewell,” the tall and handsome man said, mounting his horse and giving a slight nod.

Luo Tietou took off his boots, pretending to check for small stones inside, but his eyes were sneakily fixed on the rabbits and hazel grouse, clearly plotting something.

Lin Dan gave a respectful bow before slowly departing.

Luo Tietou took his time putting his boots back on, then mounted his steed and said with feigned concern, “Boss, why don’t we escort Shopkeeper Lin a bit further? The road ahead is full of dense forests and dangerous terrain—there could be bandits. Her servants are all southerners, small and frail. How could they possibly protect five full carts of goods?”

“Tietou is right. Shopkeeper Lin is a good person, and she’s just a weak woman. We’ve completed our mission anyway, so it wouldn’t hurt to escort her a bit longer,” Zhao Liu quickly chimed in.

The tall man turned his horse and looked at the caravan. After a brief pause, he made the decision. “Then let’s follow them.”

The three men whipped their horses and quickly caught up, explaining their intentions through the carriage curtain. Shopkeeper Lin was naturally grateful, but Xiao Zhu’s eyes nearly popped out of their sockets.

These three gluttons—could it be that they saw the wild rabbits and hazel grouse and just wanted to stick around for another meal?



=====================================

Chapter 11: The Cook (10)
At noon, as expected, everyone feasted on stir-fried hazel grouse and braised rabbit. There were nine people in total, and ordinarily, the food wouldn’t have been enough. However, Manager Lin’s culinary skills were exceptional—both dishes were bursting with flavor. A single spoonful of food mixed with rice was completely satisfying. After the meal, a layer of bright red sauce remained in the serving bowls. Luo Tietou and Zhao Liu quickly took out their steamed buns, dipping them bit by bit until the sauce was gone.

"Comfortable, really comfortable!" Luo Tietou lay on the grass, rubbing his belly. If every mission could be accompanied by Manager Lin, he’d be willing to travel all year round. That wouldn’t be hardship—it would be luxury.

"One hazel grouse is still a bit too little, not quite enough. How about we go hunt a few more later so Manager Lin can cook again tonight?" Zhao Liu suggested in a low voice.

"Sounds good to me. Since we’ve already hunted them, even if Manager Lin doesn’t like repeating dishes, she’ll have to make an exception. Wild game is best when freshly killed and cooked—that’s when it tastes the best." Luo Tietou smacked his lips, still savoring the taste of lunch.

The tall, handsome man cast them a glance but said nothing, clearly giving silent approval.

After resting for half an hour, the convoy resumed its journey. As they passed through a dense forest, Zhao Liu and Luo Tietou heard small animals scurrying through the underbrush. Without hesitation, they grabbed their bows and chased after them. They were determined to hunt more game for a hearty dinner.

The tall man merely glanced back but did not follow. A short while later, he sensed something was wrong. Just as he was about to instruct the driver to slow down, an arrow shot out of nowhere, striking one of the horses pulling the carriage. The sudden attack startled the rest of the horses, causing chaos. Some reared up while others neighed frantically, sending the convoy into disarray. Fortunately, the driver managed to rein them in and calm them down—otherwise, Manager Lin would have suffered a major loss.

But just because the goods were unharmed didn’t mean the situation was under control. Suddenly, more than a dozen burly men emerged from the thick forest, wielding machetes and bows—clearly a band of seasoned bandits.

The tall man immediately moved closer to Manager Lin’s carriage, speaking in a low voice, "Don’t resist. Go with them for now. Zhao Liu and Tietou are still behind us—they’ll find a way to rescue us." Though he was highly skilled in martial arts and could take on a dozen bandits without issue, there were too many people in the convoy for him to protect them all.

Lin Dan tapped her fingers against the carriage window, signaling her understanding.

The entire convoy, along with the carriages, was taken up the mountain. At the top, there was a small, crude bandit stronghold—five or six earthen houses enclosed by wooden fences. It was clear that the bandits had hastily built the settlement while on the run. Though it was still small in scale, if left unchecked for three to five years, it would surely become a major threat to the region.

Lin Dan's hands were tied as she stumbled forward, all the while silently counting the number of bandits. Judging by the size of the houses and what she had observed along the way, this was a small gang of around thirty men. Several kidnapped women were also present, forced to do labor with blank, numb expressions.

After being led into the largest earthen house, a fierce-looking bandit strode over and gruffly asked, "Did we get anything good this time?"

"Damn it, just some pickled vegetables and dried goods—not worth a single coin!" One of the bandits spat before adding, "But at least we got three fine young women. The brothers will have a good time tonight!"

The bandit leader, initially disappointed, quickly broke into a lecherous grin when he saw Lin Dan and the other two women. "Good, good! Their skin may not be the fairest, but those figures are quite something!"

Having traveled extensively, Lin Dan had a well-toned physique. Her slender waist was tightly cinched with a cloth belt, accentuating her ample chest and curvaceous hips. Unlike the frail, sickly beauty that was fashionable at the time, her robust charm was uniquely alluring. She remained calm in the face of danger, but her servants erupted in furious curses. Their defiance earned them gagged mouths and a rough beating.

The tall man lifted his gaze to the bandit leader, his eyes flashing with a dangerous glint.

Lin Dan cast her companions a reassuring look before speaking slowly, "Perhaps the chief is unaware, but my ancestors were imperial chefs. I learned a few skills from my father. If the chief is willing to release my servants, I would be happy to stay and cook for your men."

She had no illusions that these ruthless bandits would actually release anyone. Her true intent was to divert their attention. To ordinary folk, an imperial chef was someone they could only dream of meeting. If she could spark their curiosity, she could buy more time. And with time, there would be a chance to escape.

"You're an imperial chef?" The bandit leader's lecherous grin faded, replaced by intrigue.

"My master’s master was an imperial chef, and my father once served as the head chef for the Yongding Marquis' household," Lin Dan explained.

Hearing this, the bandit leader’s gaze changed. Both the emperor and the Yongding Marquis were figures beyond the reach of commoners. He pondered for a moment before saying, "How do I know you're telling the truth? As it happens, we recently stole two cows. If you can butcher them and prepare a meal that satisfies us, I’ll consider releasing your people."

"Then I must thank the chief in advance," Lin Dan said with a bow. "Butchering a cow is hard work. May I have my two handmaids to assist me?"

Slaughtering a cow was a dirty, labor-intensive job, and the bandits had no interest in doing it themselves. Since the two maids were still young—only twelve or thirteen years old—and posed no real threat, the bandits quickly agreed. The rest of the captives were tied up and thrown into the woodshed.

Once the bandits were gone, Xiao Zhu wriggled over to the tall man like a worm and whispered, "Big brother, do you think Zhao Liu and Tietou will find our trail? When will they get here?"

The man lay quietly on the ground, eyes slightly closed, his voice low and steady. "They will find us. Wait until nightfall."

Xiao Zhu was still anxious, staring out the window and murmuring, "I wonder how Manager Lin and the others are doing."

At that moment, Lin Dan was crouched down, carefully sharpening a knife. Every so often, she tested the blade's sharpness with her fingertip, her expression focused. Two bandits initially kept a close watch on her, but seeing that she was only tending the fire, boiling water, and sharpening her knife—without whispering with her maids or surveying the surroundings—they gradually lowered their guard and sat aside to chat.

The two cows were well-fed and healthy, clearly stolen from a farm in the valley.

After finishing her preparations, Lin Dan circled the cows a few times, running her hands over their bodies as if selecting her target. Seeing that she was finally about to start, the two bandits gathered around to watch, sneering in amusement. But their laughter soon froze.

Lin Dan picked a cow, had her maids blindfold the other one to keep it calm, and then, with one swift motion, drove her knife deep into the selected cow’s throat, severing its carotid artery. She immediately stepped back, took a ladle of water, and casually rinsed the blood off her blade.

Just five meters away, the robust farm cow collapsed silently, unable to even let out a cry as a torrent of blood gushed from its throat, quickly staining the ground.

The two bandits were dumbfounded. Lin Dan, unfazed, continued to work—scalding the hide, scraping off the hair, and burning away any remaining bristles with a red-hot iron rod. The stench of searing flesh filled the air, sending shivers down their spines.

By the time she finished skinning and butchering the cow, the bandits no longer dared to underestimate her.

"How many people are in this camp?" Lin Dan casually asked while washing her hands.

"Why do you want to know?" The bandits, now wary, shot her a guarded look.

"I need to know how many people there are so I can cook accordingly. If I prepare too little, it won't be enough for everyone." Lin Dan wiped a few blood splatters off her face with a handkerchief, her expression utterly calm.

This was a perfectly reasonable explanation. The two bandits mentally counted and replied, "There are about twenty to thirty mouths to feed. Cook a bit more."

Lin Dan nodded without further questioning. She and the two young girls carried the beef into the kitchen, cutting it into two-inch cubes before marinating it with soy sauce, cooking wine, and special salt. She then processed the ox hooves, brisket, ribs, and bones, setting them aside for later use.

"Master, how are we going to escape?" One of the young girls couldn't hold back any longer and whispered anxiously in her ear.

"Let's finish this meal first," Lin Dan replied, calmly peeling garlic.

No matter how anxious they felt, the two girls could do nothing but accept their fate and focus on washing the vegetables.

An hour later, the beef had finished marinating. Lin Dan poured half a jar of vegetable oil into a large wok, heated it until it reached about eighty percent of its smoking point, then slowly added the beef. She stir-fried the meat, flipping it skillfully until it was half-cooked before setting it aside. She discarded the excess oil, washed the wok, and added fresh oil. Once heated, she sautéed ginger slices and scallions until fragrant before returning the beef to the pot. Then, she added soy sauce, star anise, and other seasonings, continuing to stir-fry for another fifteen minutes. Finally, she poured in water and let it come to a boil before reducing the heat, carefully adjusting the firewood to keep it at a slow simmer.

With the braised beef nearly done, Lin Dan turned her attention to the ox tendons, washing and cutting them into strips before frying them in hot oil. She was preparing another dish—red-braised beef tendons.

The two young girls were completely in awe by now. They had never expected their master to focus so intently on cooking even in the middle of a bandit den. They couldn't help but wonder—was her life more important, or was making a good meal?


===================================================

Chapter 12: The Cook (11)
By the time the beef had been simmering for a while, a rich aroma was already wafting from the pot, making the two bandits restless. They circled around the stove, occasionally wiping away drool, and impatiently asked, “It’s been fifteen minutes already—shouldn’t it be ready to eat?”

“It’s still too early. It needs to simmer for at least another half an hour to become tender,” Lin Dan wiped her hands with a cloth and added, “Could you take me to my carriage? I need to fetch some seasoning.”

The two bandits immediately became wary. Pointing at the bottles and jars on the stove, they snapped, “There’s plenty of seasoning here already! Isn’t that enough for you?”

Lin Dan remained calm and explained gently, “This dish is missing a key ingredient that will make it truly flavorful. You can escort me there and back—I’m just a weak woman, do you really think I could escape from you? If I add this seasoning, the beef stew will taste several times better than it does now.”

The bandits inhaled the tantalizing aroma in the air and hesitated. If it could be even more delicious than this, just how good would it be? They were already aware that this imperial chef’s skills were beyond ordinary, and recalling the ease with which she slaughtered the cow earlier, they felt a bit uneasy.

Seeing their hesitation, Lin Dan took the initiative to tie a rope around her own wrists. Only then did the two reluctantly nod in agreement. Before leaving, they locked the kitchen door to prevent Peony and Azalea from escaping.

The three of them walked to the innermost part of the stronghold, winding through hidden paths until they reached a cave covered with thick vines. Without guidance, one might easily overlook it.

The bandits pulled aside the vines and barked, “Get in there and be quick about it!”

Lin Dan peered inside by the light of their torches and saw that her five carriages were indeed parked within the cave. Alongside them were dozens of large, locked chests—clearly stolen loot. Without wasting time, she climbed into one of the carriages, broke the seal on a large clay jar, scooped a few ladles of liquor into a small empty jug, and swiftly resealed the jar with parchment paper, tying it tightly with rope.

She moved quickly, completing the process in mere seconds, but the bandits still caught a whiff of the indescribably rich aroma of the liquor. The intoxicating scent made them feel slightly dizzy.

“What kind of liquor is this? How can it smell so incredible?” one of them asked, swallowing hard.

“It’s just ordinary homemade liquor, nothing special,” Lin Dan replied stiffly, her gaze evasive.

The two bandits gave her a long, suspicious look but said nothing more, leading her back to the kitchen.

Upon returning, Lin Dan poured the liquor into the simmering beef stew and gently stirred it with a spatula. The already rich broth thickened even more, becoming glossy and luscious. Each chunk of beef was now coated in a glistening, velvety sauce. A strange yet irresistible fragrance filled the air, piercing through the kitchen’s doors and windows, drifting across the entire stronghold, and leaving everyone utterly mesmerized.

“Hurry up! Scoop out some beef for us!” The bandits guarding Lin Dan banged their empty bowls impatiently.

“The meat isn’t tender enough yet. It needs a bit more time,” Lin Dan kindly explained.

“We don’t care if it’s tender! As long as it’s cooked, that’s good enough! Just give us some, now!” The two bandits were so desperate that their eyes turned red. That tantalizing aroma drove them mad with hunger, making them wish they could dive headfirst into the pot.

The other bandits also rushed over, demanding a taste. If not for the bandit leader maintaining order, the kitchen would have been ransacked already.

“What the hell did that woman put in the pot? How can it smell this good?” the bandit leader muttered after leaving the kitchen. He grabbed one of his subordinates and interrogated him while sniffing the lingering aroma in the air.

“Boss, let’s go check it out,” one of the bandits suggested eagerly. “There’s still a while before the food is ready—why don’t we have some drinks first?”

“Good idea! Bring the liquor out!”

A group of them carried the large clay jar to the main hall, removed the parchment cover, and took a deep breath. Immediately, their heads spun.

No wonder—the fragrance of this liquor was overwhelming. It was more potent than the strongest firewater, yet richer and more refined than the finest aged wines. They hadn’t even taken a sip, yet their mouths were already watering uncontrollably.

“Fill my bowl—now!” the bandit leader barked impatiently.

He grabbed a large bowl, gulped down the liquor, froze for a moment, and then burst into hearty laughter, showering it with praise. The other bandits couldn’t resist either, each taking a bowl and drinking deeply. The rich aroma spread through the air, luring more people over…

Meanwhile, Xiao Zhu and the others, who had been discussing their escape plan and how to rescue their master, suddenly caught a whiff of an indescribably rich, meaty fragrance. They immediately fell silent.

Then, with absolute certainty, they declared, “The boss is making rice wine-braised beef!”

“I’m starving…” one of the servants murmured, licking his lips.

The others exchanged glances, their stomachs growling in unison. Whenever their boss cooked, even those who weren’t hungry would suddenly feel ravenous.

Even the man who had been meditating with his eyes closed opened them and looked toward the kitchen, his Adam’s apple bobbing involuntarily.

Just as they were about to resume their escape discussion, an overpowering wave of liquor aroma rolled in from all directions, making their eyes burn with desperation.

Xiao Zhu, who had remained composed through their capture, beatings, and imprisonment, finally lost his cool. He spat harshly and cursed, “Damn those thunder-struck bastards! How dare they steal our liquor?!”

The handsome and silent man suddenly asked, "What kind of wine is this?"

Xiaozhu gritted his teeth and said, "Have you ever heard the legend from Zhongshan County—when Liu Xuanshi bought wine from a Zhongshan tavern..."

The man, well-versed in knowledge, immediately continued, "Xuanshi got drunk… The Thousand-Day Wine?"

Xiaozhu glanced at him in surprise and nodded. "That's right, this wine is the legendary Thousand-Day Wine. Shopkeeper Lin traveled through Zhongshan County for three years, visiting various places, and finally managed to recreate the recipe for Thousand-Day Wine. After successfully brewing it, she buried it underground for seven years. It was just recently unearthed and was intended to be sold in the capital for a good price. When the jar was opened, a wine bug had already formed inside. The wine is extremely rich and thick—though it may not make one sleep for a thousand days, it can still render someone drunk for three days and three nights."

"The Drunken Xuanshi" is a story passed down for hundreds of years. It tells of a man named Di Xi from Zhongshan County, whose brewing skills were unparalleled. A wine enthusiast named Liu Xuanshi visited him to buy wine. Di Xi sold him a jar but forgot to warn him that the wine had an extremely strong aftereffect and should be consumed in moderation—otherwise, one could sleep for a thousand days. Liu Xuanshi drank heartily and passed out upon returning home. His family, thinking he had died, buried him. A thousand days later, Di Xi suddenly remembered this incident and rushed to find him. The Liu family then unearthed Liu Xuanshi, who had just woken up, still exuding a strong wine aroma. Those who smelled it also fell into a deep sleep for three months.

In later generations, this wine became known as Thousand-Day Wine, regarded as the true celestial drink.

With the rich wine aroma filling the air and the rowdy shouts of mountain bandits playing drinking games echoing in his ears, the handsome man licked his dry lips and gritted his teeth. "They really are a bunch of beasts!" As soon as he finished speaking, he forcefully broke free from his bindings and stood up, his face dark as ink. He had originally planned to wait until midnight to take action, but now he couldn't hold back any longer.

"You—you—you… How did you untie yourself?" Xiaozhu and the others stared at him in shock.

"Stay here for now. I'll go rescue Shopkeeper Lin. When you hear the whistle, come out and meet me." To prevent them from running around and alerting the bandits, the man made sure to untie them and gave them a warning. He then tore apart the iron chain on the door latch with his bare hands, restored it slightly, and stealthily made his way toward the direction where the aroma of meat was the strongest.

Lin Dan was stir-frying beef tendons while Shaoyao and Dujuan were shaping pounded beef into meatballs and dropping them into a milky broth made from beef bones. When the man pushed the door open and entered, the three of them were momentarily stunned. However, Lin Dan reacted the fastest—she immediately pulled him inside and swiftly shut the door behind him.

"Why are you here? What about Xiaozhu and the others?" she asked in a hushed voice.

"I'm here to rescue you," the man replied steadily while selecting kitchen knives from the counter, as his weapons had been confiscated by the bandits. "I'll get you out of the stronghold first. Once you're in the forest, don't run around. Follow the stream downstream and wait for me in an open area at the foot of the mountain. Xiaozhu and the others will come with me later." The upcoming scene would be quite bloody—not suitable for women to witness. Xiaozhu and the others could be rescued last; they could even help clean up the bodies.

With that thought in mind, the man reached out to grab Lin Dan's wrist, but she gently pushed him away. "There are over thirty vicious bandits here. You're alone—how could you possibly handle them all? Sit down and eat something. We’ll be able to leave soon." As she spoke, she brought him a plate of stir-fried beef with scallions and shoved a bowl and chopsticks into his hands.

The man instinctively took the bowl and chopsticks and wolfed down a few bites. His eyes flickered with satisfaction and enjoyment, but he quickly froze and stiffened. He said awkwardly, "This isn't the time to eat. You must leave with me now!"

"Leave? Sit down and eat!" Lin Dan lightly slapped his outstretched hand away, her voice carrying a soft chuckle.

The man glanced at his slightly tingling hand, then at Lin Dan’s bright, smiling face. He fell silent and lowered his gaze.

Shaoyao and Dujuan, looking at the half-empty pot of stewed beef, complained, "We told them the meat wasn’t fully tender yet and needed more time to simmer, but they insisted on scooping it out. Such a waste!"

"As long as they’re only wasting food and not lives, that’s already fortunate." Lin Dan tilted her head, listening closely, and her smile deepened. "The noise has stopped. Let’s go take a look."

The man immediately put down his bowl and stood up, only to be pressed back down by Lin Dan. "You sit. We’ll go." With that, she and the two young girls each carried a plate of hot dishes and strolled outside at a leisurely pace. Even if they encountered the bandits, they could use the excuse of serving food to cover their tracks—there was nothing to be afraid of.

The man touched his shoulder, his expression somewhat peculiar, then quickly followed them.

They reached the main hall without incident, only to find the floor covered with unconscious bandits. Some had collapsed onto the tables, snoring thunderously. The air was thick with an intoxicating wine aroma, so strong that it almost physically pressed against them the moment they stepped through the door. Loud snores echoed from several other buildings as well, proving that the bandits had ultimately succumbed to the allure of the Thousand-Day Wine and were now completely incapacitated.

Shaoyao and Dujuan tiptoed over to peek at the large wine jar in the center of the hall, gritting their teeth in anger. "They drank the entire jar!"

Lin Dan patted their heads and repeated the same words, "As long as they didn’t harm anyone, that’s all that matters. Let’s pack up and leave."

The man looked at the drunken bandits sprawled all over the ground, astonished. He never imagined that without a single fight, Lin Dan had already resolved everything—there was no need for anyone to save her.

Lin Dan walked past him and said leisurely, "In my world, there’s nothing that a good meal can’t fix."

As soon as her words fell, the sound of galloping hooves echoed from outside the stronghold. In the distance, the glow of torches approached in droves. Something unexpected was unfolding.

======================


Chapter 13: The Cook 12
Hearing the commotion, the man immediately reassured them, “Find a place to hide, I’ll go take a look. The hoofbeats are uniform, indicating they’re well-trained soldiers. This place isn’t far from the Cangshan military camp; a round trip takes just half an hour. It seems Zhao Liu and Ironhead couldn’t find us and went to get reinforcements.”

Lin Dan nodded, watching him leave. To be cautious, she and the two young girls found a concealed spot to hide. Moments later, the gate of the mountain stronghold slowly opened, and the man entered with a tall, burly general with a thick, bristling beard, followed by Zhao Liu and Luo Ironhead.

“Damn it, dragged out to this godforsaken mountain in the middle of the night for a rescue, only to find out it was a wasted trip! The ones I brought are my personal guards—losing even one of them would be like a knife to my heart. Even though no battle took place tonight, we were prepared for a tough fight. You better remember this favor!” the bearded general grumbled impatiently.

“General, we rescued a few from the woodshed, they’re unharmed,” a soldier reported as he approached, followed closely by Xiao Zhu and the others, who were thanking them profusely.

“What about the shopkeeper? Didn’t you say there was a Lin Shopkeeper who absolutely had to be rescued?” The bearded general looked around impatiently.

“I’m here. Many thanks to the soldiers for coming to our aid. Lin humbly expresses gratitude!” Lin Dan immediately stepped out from her hiding spot and bowed deeply, while Peony and Azalea also nervously cupped their hands in thanks.

The bearded general scrutinized Lin Dan, noting her graceful figure but unremarkable features, and instantly lost interest. He had assumed that the Lin Shopkeeper whom Zhao Liu and Luo Ironhead had been so insistent on rescuing must have been an exceptionally stunning beauty, but it turned out to be just this.

“Forget it, forget it, get up already.” The bearded general grew even more impatient. “My men train hard all day and now had to trek up here in the dead of night. Who knows how many will be exhausted tomorrow? If we’d known this was just a small-time bandit hideout, we wouldn’t have bothered coming at all!”

Zhao Liu and Luo Ironhead looked embarrassed. Had they known these bandits were so insignificant, they wouldn’t have rushed down the mountain to call for reinforcements. Their leader was highly skilled and could surely protect himself, but Lin Shopkeeper and the two young girls were at great risk. Bandits had no humanity—women were violated, and men had their tongues cut out and were sold to the coal mines in the western mountains. They dared not delay and had immediately summoned troops.

“The bandits—did you take care of them all?” The bearded general turned to the handsome man, not doubting for a second that he had the ability.

“They were all taken care of by Lin Shopkeeper,” the man gestured toward the hall.

The group rushed in to check and was utterly stunned.

“Damn it,” the bearded general muttered, pacing back and forth among the sprawled-out bodies of the bandits. He then strode over to the empty wine jar and took a deep sniff, his expression darkening. “What kind of wine is this? It smells incredible!”

Xiao Zhu proudly replied, “This is Thousand-Day Wine, brewed by our shopkeeper.”

“Thousand-Day Wine? The same one that Liu Xuanshi drank?” The bearded general’s voice rose in shock. Unable to resist, he grabbed a used cup from a bandit, poured the remaining drops into his mouth, and smacked his lips noisily.

“Amazing! This is truly rare and exceptional wine! It’s fragrant, rich, strong—smooth going down, burning in the belly, spicy with a sweet aftertaste, and lingers on the palate… This is the best wine I’ve ever had, worthy of its legendary name, Thousand-Day Wine!” The bearded general raved as he grabbed every cup on the table, downing even the last precious drops.

His soldiers, just as fond of drinking as he was, scoured the area for leftover wine, but to no avail. The greedy bandits had already emptied the entire jar.

“Gone! Damn it, all gone! Would it have killed you bastards to save a little?” The bearded general, unable to find more, kicked a passed-out bandit in frustration, swearing, “Damn you! Robbing and drinking on my turf! When you wake up, I’ll make sure you regret it!”

The bandit he kicked coughed up blood but remained unconscious, proving just how potent the wine was.

Sensing the need to defuse the situation, Lin Dan clasped her hands in gratitude. “Thank you, esteemed soldiers, for coming to our aid at this late hour. There is still some food in the kitchen. I will bring it out for everyone to have a bite. After a long journey, you all must be exhausted.”

Zhao Liu and Luo Ironhead, who had been eyeing the remnants of food on the table hungrily, perked up immediately. Even the handsome man swallowed discreetly. The bearded general, who had never tasted Lin Shopkeeper’s cooking, was indifferent, while his soldiers nodded nonchalantly as they secured the bandits with ropes.

Lin Dan smiled and led the two young girls to the kitchen. The bandits had been too focused on drinking to eat much, so most of the food was still warm on the stove.

Soon, the dishes were brought out—a large pot of beef stewed in rice wine, another filled with bone broth and beef meatballs, a plate of braised beef tendons, a plate of stir-fried beef with scallions, and a bucket of white rice. The portions were generous, enough to feed twenty or thirty people. The food was piping hot, steam rising in fragrant waves, filling the hall with an irresistible blend of meaty aroma and rich wine scent.

Gulp. The bearded general swallowed hard.

Gulp, gulp... The personal guards he had brought along stood up one after another, swallowing their saliva while clutching their stomachs, feeling as though a swarm of greedy worms were stirring wildly inside them.

"Thank you, officers, for coming to our rescue. I have little to offer in return, but I have some skill in cooking. Please accept this meal as a token of my gratitude, and I hope you won't find it lacking," Lin Dan expressed her thanks once again, her tone sincere. Her servants had already cleaned up the messy table and were serving rice one by one.

The bearded general stretched his neck and swallowed hard, then quickly waved his hand, "Not at all, not at all! This is well deserved, well deserved!" He grinned widely, all traces of impatience gone. His personal guards gathered around eagerly, looking ready to pounce on the food.

"Eat," the handsome man finally spoke, and at his command, the crowd hastily picked up their bowls and chopsticks.

"This beef stew was cooked with Thousand-Day Wine?" The bearded general widened his already large eyes even further after taking a bite. He immediately quickened his pace, scooping food into his bowl as though a storm was sweeping through. The others were no less enthusiastic, devouring the meal with oil dripping from their lips, their faces full of admiration.

The stewed beef was made from five-flower beef, with tender lean meat interwoven with snowy white fat. It was soft and melt-in-the-mouth; the beef meatballs, made from neck and short rib meat, were pounded repeatedly with wooden sticks until smooth and springy. Once cooked, they naturally formed a hollow center that absorbed the beef oil and broth—one gentle bite would release a burst of rich, savory juice, an irresistible explosion of flavor. The beef tendons were first deep-fried, then steamed for a quarter of an hour, and finally stir-fried in a thick, glossy sauce. The red glaze coated each piece perfectly—at first bite, it was soft and tender, but just before breaking apart, a subtle chewiness emerged, making the texture absolutely divine.

This entire meal was an ultimate feast of flavors—rich where it should be rich, tender where it should be tender, thick where it should be thick, and fresh where it should be fresh. Lin Dan had truly outdone herself! Even though the soldiers wolfed down the food, scrambling for every bite, they were only half full. Any lingering resentment about their late-night mission vanished, replaced only by satisfaction. This trip was worth it—truly worth it!

Noticing that they weren’t completely full, Lin Dan took the time to crack open beef bones that had been simmering for two hours and made a pot of marrow soup. The soft, stewed bone marrow nestled within the hollow bones could be easily sucked out with a gentle pull—its flavor was rich beyond words, not only cleansing the palate but seemingly refreshing every pore in their bodies.

The bearded general held a beef bone in both hands, slurping the marrow with great enthusiasm. He then turned to Lin Dan, his tone especially eager, "Master Lin, how is your cooking this good? Zhao Liu and the others said you're heading to the capital to open a restaurant? If you do, you must let me know—I’ll bring my brothers over to support your business!"

Lin Dan ladled a spoonful of soup for the handsome man and handed him a bone, humbly replying, "My skills are nothing special, General, you're too kind. But if you ever visit the capital, please feel free to stop by my shop..."

Before she could finish speaking, the handsome man interjected coldly, "Support is fine, but you must pay for your meals. Master Lin is running a business, and it's not easy." He shot a sharp glance at the bearded general, making the latter shiver involuntarily. Hastily, the general promised that he would definitely pay, not a single coin less.

Lin Dan caught the subtle exchange between the two and could tell that the handsome man's status was far from ordinary. However, she chose not to probe further. When traveling, one should avoid speaking too much, looking too closely, or meddling too much—it only leads to trouble. In any case, once they reached the capital, their paths would no longer cross, so there was no need to pry.

After everyone had finished eating, Lin Dan led them to retrieve her carriage and, in the process, confiscated the bandits' stolen goods. The handsome man had no idea how she had managed to uncover the hiding place of the loot, but his respect for her intelligence deepened.

While helping Lin Dan sort through her goods, the bearded general meticulously checked every item, confirming that she truly had no more wine left. Only then did he reluctantly return to his camp. That very night, he brought the small jar of Thousand-Day Wine into the capital, heading straight for his superior—Marquis Weiyuan. If anyone could be said to love wine more than life itself, it was this marquis. Alongside Marquis Yongding, one guarded the southeast, the other the northwest—both were among the most powerful figures in Great Chu. With just a word from him, the bearded general’s rise to glory would be within reach.



=============================================



Chapter 14: The Cook (13)
The Marquis of Weiyuan’s love for alcohol was infamous throughout the Great Chu Kingdom. He couldn’t eat a meal without liquor, nearly froze to death in the wilderness one snowy night due to drunkenness, and the first thing he did upon waking was drink again—truly a man who wouldn’t repent until he faced death itself. He had once been a formidable war hero and had saved the late emperor’s life three times. Though now recuperating in the capital, uncertain when he would return to his post in the southeast, he remained an untouchable figure. In his possession was a golden whip, a gift from the late emperor on his deathbed, granting him the authority to punish tyrants above and execute traitors below—a symbol of immense power.

To cater to his tastes, every visitor brought him fine liquor as a tribute. When he drank happily, he spoke freely; if the wine was subpar, he would promptly throw the person out. Gaining the Marquis of Weiyuan’s favor seemed simple, but in reality, it was not. He had followed his father into battle at the age of eight, taken his first life at nine, and that very night, he drank the strongest liquor in the world, becoming completely intoxicated. From that moment, he was addicted to alcohol—a habit that had persisted for thirty years. He had tasted countless wines and spirits, and ordinary good wine no longer impressed him. Even the rarest of brews had passed his lips, making it nearly impossible to satisfy his refined palate.

The bearded general had spent an untold fortune in private to procure a wine that would please the Marquis, yet all his efforts had ended in failure. He never expected to stumble upon the incredibly skilled Master Lin and even obtain, free of charge, a legendary jar of Thousand-Day Wine. His excitement was barely containable. He rushed as fast as he could and only reached the capital three days later. Without stopping to rest at an inn, he headed straight for the Marquis of Weiyuan’s residence.

Every day, at least dozens—if not a hundred—people sent wine to the Marquis’ estate. The steward couldn’t possibly grant entry to all of them, so he simply accepted the wine and dismissed the bearded general. The general repeatedly emphasized that this was the rare Thousand-Day Wine and pleaded for the steward to personally deliver it to the Marquis. Though the steward agreed readily, he turned around and tossed the jar into the storage room dedicated to wine collection.

The jar itself was only the size of a palm, and it wasn’t even full—light as a feather in the hand, truly unimpressive! These gift-givers were becoming more and more absurd! After leaving the storage room, the steward scoffed at the bearded general in his heart, then promptly forgot about the whole matter. And so, the jar of Thousand-Day Wine sat quietly on the shelf, gathering dust, unseen and unnoticed.

Meanwhile, Lin Dan’s caravan continued traveling along the official road. To prevent further mishaps, the three burly men who had accompanied her remained by her side as guards. After breakfast, they eagerly awaited lunch; after lunch, they anticipated dinner; after dinner, they shamelessly asked if there would be a late-night snack. Life was extraordinarily comfortable. What had originally been a perilous mission had turned into a feast-filled journey. The three men had lost over seven or eight pounds from their grueling travels over the past few months, but now, under Master Lin’s skillful cooking, they had regained their lost weight, their complexions growing rosier by the day.

Four days later, the caravan reached the outskirts of the capital. Another half-day’s journey would bring them to the western city gates. However, Lin Dan chose to stop at a small town along the way to part ways with the three men.

Reluctant to leave, they insisted, "Since we've escorted you this far, we might as well see it through to the end!" In truth, they simply couldn't bear to part with her cooking and were shamelessly trying to stay.

Lin Dan found their antics both amusing and exasperating. Unable to refuse, she allowed them to remain.

"Mother, I’m home!" she called as she led the group into a quaint farmhouse. The courtyard was filled with lush vegetable patches, a flock of chickens and ducks, and vibrant red and white roses, creating a warm and inviting atmosphere.

"Dan'er, you're finally back!" An elderly woman, looking much frailer than before, ran out of the house with tears welling in her eyes. In earlier years, she had traveled with her daughter to learn various culinary skills, but as her health declined, she had been sent back to the capital to recuperate. However, the capital, despite its vastness, was not a place to escape fate. One day, she unexpectedly encountered Lin Dan’s second uncle and his family. The uncle, in turn, informed Madam Zhou and Yan Shouye. The two then hired local thugs to harass her daily, pushing her to the brink of despair—she had nearly thrown herself into a well.

She could not understand why these people, who had already stolen her husband’s assets, still wanted to drive her and her daughter to ruin. But the depths of human greed and malice were unfathomable. Left with no other choice, she had retreated to this secluded town, where she had finally enjoyed a few years of peace.

"Mother, pack up your things. We’ll rest here for a few days before returning to the capital," Lin Dan said as she scooped water from a gourd ladle to serve the group.

"Return to the capital?" Madam Qi hesitated, fear evident in her eyes. She had been utterly terrified by Madam Zhou and Yan Shouye, and she no longer had the courage to reclaim what was rightfully hers.

"Yes, of course we’re going back," Lin Dan replied calmly, yet her expression was resolute. She had once vowed to restore the Lin family’s reputation and clear Lin Baotian’s name. How could she abandon that promise now? After ten years of wandering, this land had become her home, and the original Lin Dan’s life had become her own. Thus, the original Lin Dan’s responsibilities were now hers to bear.

"Alright then, I’ll start packing," Madam Qi said. "The chickens and ducks outside have been raised for over two months now—feel free to catch one for a meal." She then turned and went inside.

Lin Dan rolled up her sleeves and announced, "For lunch today, we’ll have Dong’an Chicken and Yongzhou Blood Duck."

The group cheered in excitement and immediately got to work.

Lin Dan scalded the freshly slaughtered poultry in boiling water to make plucking easier. The handsome man stood beside her, gazing down and asking in a low voice, "Have you and your mother been wandering all these years?"

"Yes," Lin Dan replied, carefully placing the plucked feathers into a bamboo basket. Chicken feathers could be made into dusters, and fine duck down could be used for insulation—both were useful.

The man stared at the married woman’s hairpin in her bun for a long while before finally asking, unable to suppress his curiosity, "Then where is your husband? Why isn’t he by your side?"

Lin Dan looked up in surprise, clearly not expecting the man to inquire about her private matters. He appeared to be a silent, reserved, and aloof person, not one to show interest in others' personal affairs. However, there was nothing to hide, so she spoke candidly, "I haven’t married, so where would a husband come from? I only tied my hair in a woman’s bun for convenience when traveling. As you can see, my only family is my mother. If I were to marry, what would happen to her when she’s left alone? Besides, I’ve been traveling and learning art for many years, drifting from place to place with no stable home. How could I invite someone to be my husband?"

After speaking, she smiled lightly, her attitude carefree. "Now, things are good. The hardest times are behind us. What’s there to fear in the future? As long as I teach some good apprentices, I won’t need to worry about being without someone to support me in my old age." Her tone then softened, as if remembering something painful. The light in her eyes gradually faded, and she sighed wistfully.

The man frowned deeply, as if he had many things he wanted to say but didn’t know where to begin. He took the chickens and ducks from her, carefully plucking their feathers. When he saw that Lin Dan had nothing left to do and was about to start a fire, he spoke in a deep voice, "Go rest inside. Spend some time talking with your mother. Leave the work outside to us."

Lin Dan glanced towards the house, noticing that Madam Qi was watching her eagerly, and smiled in response. This person appeared cold on the outside, but was actually kind-hearted—a good person.

After lunch, Lin Dan saw Madam Qi back to her room to rest and then went out with a small gift box to visit someone. The handsome man immediately followed her, worried she might encounter danger.

Lin Dan heard the footsteps and turned around, flashing him a bright smile.

The man stared at her radiant smile, his gaze flickering uncertainly.

The two walked in silence, yet it didn’t feel awkward or heavy, but rather light and easy. After turning a few winding paths and stepping onto a main road, they came upon a post station. Beside it, there was a small grass hut where a middle-aged woman was bustling about, her loud shouts carrying from afar.

Lin Dan approached and cupped her hands in greeting, "Sister Wang, it’s been a long time! How have you been? Where is your mother-in-law? Why isn’t she at the shop?"

"Who are you?" The middle-aged woman paused for a moment, then said, "Ah, I remember now! You’re that little girl who used to do work for my family! It’s been ten years, and you’ve grown so much!" Back then, Lin Dan had been small and unassuming, but she was very hardworking. She could carry a hundred-pound sack of beans on her shoulder, leaving a deep impression on the woman.

Lin Dan confirmed her identity and patiently inquired about the old woman’s condition. The middle-aged woman rolled her eyes, seemingly disdainful of her mother-in-law, and refused to answer any of Lin Dan’s questions. Lin Dan had no choice but to buy two bowls of tofu balls from her, paying an extra five coins, before she finally learned that the old woman was selling food up ahead, about a 15-minute walk away.

The tofu balls tasted just as they had before, indicating that the middle-aged woman had spent ten years learning her mother-in-law’s cooking. Yet, Lin Dan couldn’t help but wonder why they had split the business.

As she walked, Lin Dan asked passing travelers for information, feeling an indescribable sadness in her heart. The old woman had treated her son and daughter-in-law with true sincerity, but after learning the cooking skills, her daughter-in-law had proposed they split the business. Not only did she make the old woman and her underage son live separately, but she also took over the family restaurant.

The old woman’s shop had become well-known, and its location by the post station meant it had a steady flow of customers, ensuring its success. The new shop she opened, however, was in a remote area, and with the same food and prices, customers naturally preferred to visit the familiar place. Over time, her daughter-in-law had completely replaced her.

Now, the old woman’s income was meager, and her youngest son had broken his leg a few years ago but couldn’t afford treatment, leaving him disabled. Life had become incredibly difficult.

When Lin Dan arrived, she saw the old woman drawing water while her son hobbled up to her, trying to take the heavy shoulder pole, but was stopped by his mother. They quarreled over it, their eyes reddened, yet full of tenderness and concern for each other.

Seeing this, Lin Dan’s heart ached, and without saying a word, she walked over, took the shoulder pole from them, lifted the water bucket, and strode into the shop. The handsome man paused for a moment, then quickly stepped forward, lifting the heavy water bucket and pouring it into the water barrel. He then took the shoulder pole from her, speaking in a low voice, "Where is the water source? I’ll fetch it. You rest."

"It’s at the foot of that mountain, just follow this path straight ahead," Lin Dan replied. She had been living here for three months, and had to carry water every day, so she knew the water source well.

The man nodded silently and went on his way.

The old woman, still in a daze, finally snapped back to reality, her voice trembling with surprise, "Is that you, little Dan? Good girl, where have you been all these years? I’ve been searching for you everywhere!"


========================================
Chapter 15: The Chef (14)

It was naturally a joyful reunion when old friends met again, and Wang Dazhu pulled Lin Dan’s hand and chatted with her for quite a while. Coming back here felt like returning home to Lin Dan. She quickly tied up her headscarf, rolled up her sleeves, and naturally got to work. When the handsome man returned carrying two buckets of water, he found her already sitting in the back kitchen, grinding soybeans for soy milk. Wang Dazhu was adding firewood to the stove, talking nonstop about the events of these years. "Teaching apprentices has its drawbacks. If I had known those two were such heartless people, I would never have passed my skills on to them."

"Not everyone is like that. Don’t you remember the saying, ‘If the master teaches well, the apprentice will provide for them in old age’? The tofu-making skills you taught me, well, now I’ve come back to take care of you," Lin Dan said with a light laugh.

Wang Dazhu quickly waved her hand, "Don’t say that! I only taught you for three months, and you still helped me with so much work every day. In fact, I benefited more from you, so how could I let you take care of me? I’m getting by with my youngest son; don’t let me become a burden to you!" As she spoke, her eyes reddened. Her own son ignored her, but the little girl who had learned just one dish from her treated her like family—how could she bear it?

Her youngest son walked in with red eyes and hoarsely said, "Lin sis, thank you for your kind intentions. I recently found a long-term job at Master Zhou’s house, helping with the livestock. It’s enough to take care of my mother, and it’s not too hard. Please don’t worry."

Lin Dan waved her hand. "When I say ‘taking care of you,’ it’s not about just getting by. I think you misunderstood. Aunty, back then you taught me one dish, and now I’ll teach you three. Once you’ve mastered them, you can attract more customers and get back to the good old days. What do you think?" She spoke while carefully filtering the soy milk with cheesecloth, then poured it into a large pot to cook.

The handsome man said nothing but silently took over the task of grinding the soybeans for soy milk, his gaze never leaving Lin Dan as she spoke confidently.

Lin Dan chopped coriander, spring onions, and pickled vegetables into small pieces, then fried sesame seeds and peanuts in oil until fragrant, pounding them into a paste to set aside. She then explained, "You’ve been selling the same dish all year round, and customers get tired of it, so business naturally declines. Your tofu-making skills are great, why not make a few more tofu dishes? The dish I’m teaching you today is one I learned in Fushun County. It’s called tofu brain, or tofu flower. It’s a half-finished tofu product, but it’s just as delicious as tofu. You can serve it in two flavors: salty or sweet. Your shop is right next to the main road, and there are customers from all over. When northern guests come, you serve them the salty version; when southern guests come, serve them the sweet version. In the spring, autumn, and winter, serve it hot; in summer, chill it in well water. Tofu brain doesn’t have a strong flavor by itself, so the sauce is what gives it taste. There are many types of sauces, like spicy, fragrant, sour, and sweet. You can serve it with sugarcane syrup, brown sugar, malt syrup, or others. Just one bowl of tofu brain with two spoonfuls of sauce can give you hundreds of flavor combinations. It’s easy to satisfy any customer’s taste, isn’t that better than just selling tofu balls? What’s more, tofu brain is quick to make. Once sold out, you can make a large pot in just 15 minutes. Freshly made, customers can always eat the freshest ingredients. How could they not like that?"

When it came to cooking, Lin Dan couldn’t stop talking. Before she knew it, she had made two bowls of tofu brain: one salty and one with goji berries and brown sugar, both looking vibrant and appetizing.

The handsome man silently took a bite of the salty tofu brain. The incredibly tender texture immediately conquered his taste buds, and the rich soy flavor mixed with the spicy broth rolled around in his mouth, sliding down his throat in a wonderfully satisfying way. His eyes lit up as he immediately took a bite of the sweet tofu brain. The tofu was sweet and tender, melting slowly on his tongue, and when he bit into the goji berries, he tasted a slight bitterness—it was a masterful touch. The texture was so smooth, the flavor so varied, that after scooping up a spoonful, he couldn’t stop.

Wang Dazhu and her son hesitantly tasted a spoonful and were immediately amazed.

After making the tofu brain, Lin Dan fried a dish of Zhenxiang tofu, serving it with two types of sauces: sweet and salty. If customers weren’t satisfied, they could mix their own sauces. Finally, she improved Wang Dazhu’s signature dish—soup tofu balls—by making dry-fried tofu balls. When they entered the pot, they were solid, but when they came out, they were hollow. When you gently break open the crispy shell, you’ll find a layer of fresh, sweet, thick soy milk inside. It was crispy on the outside, tender on the inside, and full of juice, with a unique texture. She then mixed spicy chili, garlic, and wild onion into a dipping sauce and filled the hollow tofu balls with it. Eating it together, you get the crispy exterior, tender interior, and the fresh, spicy flavor—it was absolutely delicious. If someone couldn’t handle the spiciness, they could replace the dipping sauce with red bean paste or crushed sesame and peanuts, and it would taste just as incredible.

These three dishes were highly adaptable. As long as customers liked them, you could adjust the flavors however you wanted. Once mastered, you’d never have to worry about making a living. Wang Dazhu and Wang Xiaodi weren’t fools. After tasting the dishes and listening to the explanation, they were both delighted and ashamed, unsure whether they should accept such a generous gift.

Lin Dan never spoke in vain. After teaching them the dishes, she also shared some business tips. "In spring, autumn, and winter, you can offer free hot tea to passing customers. In summer, make some cold jelly and keep it chilled. Then hang a flag with ‘Free Tea’ written on it. Tired customers will stop for a drink, and you can casually ask if they want to order food. The business will naturally pick up. Most people can’t read, so Xiao Di can sit on the roadside and shout when he sees a merchant caravan coming, calling out to attract customers. With Wang Dazhu’s skills, you don’t have to worry about customer dissatisfaction. Once the customers are happy, the reputation will spread, and business will only improve. Don’t you think?"

"Yes, yes!" Wang Dazhu and Wang Xiaodi nodded continuously, their eyes brimming with tears. They could tell that Lin Dan truly wanted to help them, otherwise, she wouldn’t have said so much. Who could have imagined that a small kindness from years ago would lead to such a great blessing? There really are many good people in the world.

They were so busy that they worked until evening. Lin Dan, with the starlight above her, walked freely along the main road, feeling lighthearted. What was hers, she would take back. What she owed, she would repay. She would live honestly.

The handsome man silently followed behind her, his gaze filled with complex emotions.

These three dishes couldn’t be learned in a day, so Lin Dan had no choice but to stay in the town a few more days, helping Wang Dazhu in the shop. Xiao Di would prepare hot tea and sit by the roadside, shouting to attract customers. Sure enough, many merchant caravans and travelers passed by. Initially, they only intended to drink the free tea and leave, but the delicious smells from the kitchen soon lured them in. They ordered bowls of tofu brain to try, and once they tasted it, they couldn’t stop. Some people had such big appetites they even finished four or five bowls, still wanting more. Northern and southern customers alike all loved it.

It only took three days for Wang Daniu's small shop to go from empty to bustling with customers. After three days, Lin Dan left, and Wang Daniu began experimenting with new flavors to sell, which received a good response. Over time, the dilapidated thatched hut was transformed into a sturdy earthen house, and after a few more years, it was rebuilt into a row of wooden houses. Eventually, it became a well-known restaurant specializing in tofu flower, famous far and wide. Meanwhile, Wang Daniu's daughter-in-law, who had been pushed out of business, shamelessly returned to apologize, but was driven away and became the laughingstock of the surrounding villages.

Lin Dan was unaware of these later events. She took her mother back to the capital, settling her in the small courtyard she had already purchased, and after a brief rest, she headed to the West District to inspect shop fronts. The idea of opening a store in the capital had been in the works for two years and was now at the stage where everything was ready except for the final piece.

In the capital, there is a saying: "The East is rich, the West is noble, the North is poor, and the South is lowly." The West District is home to the powerful and noble; the East District is home to the wealthy; the North is where the poor reside; and the South is populated by migrant laborers who live by hard work, thus considered lowly.

Lin Baotian was skilled in Shandong cuisine, and over the years, Lin Dan had also delved into it. Naturally, upon returning to open a store, she intended to continue serving Shandong cuisine. There is a saying in the culinary world that Shandong cuisine is for officials, Cantonese cuisine is for merchants, Sichuan cuisine is for the people, and Huaiyang cuisine is for scholars. To cater to officials, she had to open a shop in the West District to attract customers.

Lin Dan had already sent several servants back to the capital to search for a shop. After waiting a couple of months, they finally found a grocery store in Qingyun Alley in the West District that was struggling to stay afloat and was looking to transfer ownership. This grocery store happened to be opposite the Yan family's restaurant.

Logically, now that Lin Dan had safely arrived in the capital, the tall, handsome man should have left, but he didn't. He didn’t explain why, only silently followed behind her like a guardian. Sensing no ill intent, Lin Dan didn't mind and proceeded to negotiate with the grocery store owner about the price.

The tall, handsome man stood at the entrance, his gaze shifting toward the Yan family's restaurant across the street, his expression somewhat complicated.

"You want to open a restaurant and serve Shandong cuisine too?" The grocery store owner hesitated before saying, "Lin shopkeeper, it's not that I'm trying to make things difficult, but my family has encountered some trouble and needs a large sum of money. The price you offered is reasonable but not particularly high, and several other buyers have come to me offering a better price. In business, the one who offers the highest price gets the deal, I'm sure you understand?"

Lin Dan frowned and said, "Shopkeeper, if you have a price in mind, just tell me. If it’s reasonable, I’ll take it, if not, forget it."

The shopkeeper quoted a price that Lin Dan could not afford at the moment. After considering it briefly, she decisively replied, "Shopkeeper, wait for me one day. Tomorrow, I’ll bring the money and you can prepare the transfer documents."

Once the deal was settled, she sent her servants to retrieve the goods and wandered around Qingyun Alley to assess the situation.

"Three hundred and sixty taels of silver, this price is enough to buy two such shops, you're losing out," the tall, handsome man said as he followed her, his voice deep.

"You don’t understand. I want that shop," Lin Dan said firmly, waving her hand.

The tall, handsome man turned back to look at the prosperous Yan family restaurant, where customers were flocking in, and then glanced at the grocery store across the street. He couldn’t help but sigh inwardly: Lin Dan was planning to go head-to-head with the Yan family restaurant, wasn't she?



=========================

Chapter 16: The Cook

Indeed, Lin Dan's return to the capital was intended to rival the Yan Family Restaurant. She had no regret about losing to Yan Langqing, but the Yan Family Restaurant had once been Lin's Tavern, founded by her father, Lin Baotian. Every signature dish in the tavern had been his creation, but in the end, it was taken over by the second and third branches of the family, as well as the Yan family. How could such an unfair situation exist?

While the Yan family felt no guilt, Lin Dan, who inherited her family's legacy, could never move past this grievance. As the saying goes, "What’s rightfully hers, she will take back; what’s not, even if given freely, she doesn’t want."

As the old saying goes, "Know yourself and know your enemy, and you will never be defeated." If Lin Dan was to challenge the Yan Family Restaurant, she had to first taste their food and assess the flavors. However, her appearance hadn't changed much over the years. If the people from the second or third branches recognized her, they might cause trouble, so she had to ask the handsome man to pick up a few of their signature dishes and bring them elsewhere to eat.

After finishing the meal, the two sat in a private room of a teahouse. The handsome man quietly asked, “How was the taste of the Yan Family’s dishes?”

“Their skills are very good, truly worthy of being a royal kitchen family,” Lin Dan gave an objective evaluation.

“And compared to yours?” The handsome man had never tasted Lin Dan's Shandong cuisine and was eager to try it.

“Wait until I open the shop, then you’ll know,” Lin Dan smiled lightly, then left the room. Though she didn’t answer directly, her calm demeanor was enough to convey her confidence.

The handsome man watched her straight back as she walked away, shaking his head with a smile.

The two continued to stroll through Qingyun Alley and, as they turned a corner, saw another Shandong restaurant. Lin Dan waved and said, “Let’s go in and have a look.” Since she was planning to open her own restaurant, it was essential to learn about nearby competitors—not to steal business, but to avoid their weaknesses and play to her strengths.

This restaurant was called Qiaoyuan Restaurant, which was twice the size of the Yan Family Restaurant and decorated luxuriously with pavilions, bridges, and flowing water, creating an elegant atmosphere. High-ranking officials and the wealthy liked to show off their status when dining out, and Qiaoyuan Restaurant’s decor far surpassed that of the Yan Family Restaurant. It should have been thriving, but Lin Dan and the handsome man sat in the main hall for a long time, and only five or six tables were occupied. Compared to the Yan Family Restaurant’s constant stream of customers, this was a stark contrast.

When the dishes arrived, Lin Dan quickly discovered the reason: the chefs at Qiaoyuan Restaurant simply couldn’t cook properly, and the Shandong cuisine was subpar.

“After tasting the Yan Family’s dishes, these here taste one or two levels lower. No wonder they can’t keep customers coming back,” Lin Dan sighed as she put down her chopsticks.

The handsome man didn’t respond, but he signaled for the waiter to come over and settle the bill. Just as Lin Dan reached for her purse, the handsome man stopped her, and with a swift movement, a small silver ingot weighing one and a half taels was placed in the waiter’s hand, settling the bill in an instant. The waiter, baffled by the appearance of the silver ingot, scratched his head in confusion.

Lin Dan was amused and lightly smiled, then spoke to the waiter, “Does your restaurant need dry goods? I have some top-quality ones I brought back from Nanyang, including abalone, bird’s nest, sea cucumbers, scallops, and so on. I also have mountain treasures, many varieties, and I can provide a steady supply.”

To support her family, Lin Dan had to engage in small business ventures while learning the culinary arts. Over time, she established a merchant caravan that specialized in trading dry goods, bringing seafood from the coastal areas to the inland and taking mountain treasures to the coast, making a decent profit along the way.

Since the restaurant catered to high-ranking clientele, they naturally required high-quality ingredients. The waiter didn’t dare make a decision and quickly called the owner out. The owner was happy to secure a stable source of ingredients, and Lin Dan had her servants bring the goods for inspection.

The owner wasn’t very knowledgeable about the quality of the ingredients, so he had to call for the head chef. The head chef, just twenty years old, was handsome and youthful, though still quite inexperienced. While his cooking skills weren’t impressive, his eye for quality was exceptional. He immediately identified the ingredients, saying, “The abalone is all double-headed, the bird’s nest is from the early rainy season with official nests, the shark fins include sea tiger fins, group fins, and Tianjiu fins—all top quality… The black fungus isn’t ordinary; it’s rock fungus picked from cliffs, a rare mountain treasure. All of these are premium ingredients, no fake.”

After speaking, he let out a long sigh, seemingly relieved. With this batch of exceptional dry goods, he no longer had to worry about creating delicious Shandong dishes. Originally, he had two more years before he could officially open his own restaurant, but his father had suddenly passed away from illness, and the tavern was his father’s life's work, so he had to take over. However, his cooking skills still lacked refinement, and since taking charge, business had steadily declined, to the point that it was becoming unsustainable. If he weren’t both the head chef and the owner, the manager would have long since fired him.

“We’ll take the whole batch, Lin shopkeeper. Name your price,” the chef decisively stated.

Lin Dan offered a moderate price—not too high, but not cheap either. Seeing that the chef readily took out silver notes, she relaxed. “Are there any other restaurants around here? If you can point them out, it will save me from running around in vain. Don’t worry, I have no more top-quality goods left, only some inferior ones. Selling them to other businesses won’t affect you.”

The young chef shook his head and responded gruffly, “There are no other restaurants. On these few streets, there’s only Qiaoyuan Restaurant and the Yan Family Restaurant. You’re outsiders, so you probably don’t know, but the Yan Family Restaurant’s owner is a royal chef with significant power. It’s forbidden for any other Shandong restaurant to open nearby and compete with them.”

“But aren’t you doing just fine?” Lin Dan furrowed her brows, and the handsome man’s expression also darkened slightly.

"My family is not without history. My grandfather served the late emperor, and my father served the empress dowager. Both were imperial chefs who came from the palace. The painting hanging in my hall is a genuine work of the late emperor himself. No matter how arrogant the Yan family is, they wouldn’t dare to bully me," the handsome chef said with pride, though his heart was also uneasy. His family had a solid background, but his culinary skills were lacking, and in recent years, the restaurant had been on a downward trend. Meanwhile, Yan Langqing, despite her young age, had already become the head chef of the imperial kitchen and was the emperor’s favorite. Her fame had spread from the palace to the outside world.

The seasoned food connoisseurs in the West District may not show her respect, but they had to show respect to the emperor. Thus, Yan’s family restaurant continued to grow larger.

Lin Dan frequently sent people back to the capital to gather information, and she had learned about Yan Langqing’s rise to power. After leaving the Hou family, she became the head chef at Yan’s restaurant. One day, when the emperor visited in disguise, he happened to dine at her restaurant, greatly admiring her culinary skills. He had an enjoyable conversation with her, after which he invited her into the palace to cook, eventually leading to her favor.

Lin Dan didn’t pay much attention to Yan Langqing’s fortunes after that, not realizing how far she had risen.

The handsome chef continued, “The head of the Yan family is Yan Langqing, and her signature dish is Wanfu meat. The emperor tasted it for the first time and immediately fell in love with it, keeping her in the palace as the imperial chef. I heard that if the emperor goes a day without eating her dishes, he feels uneasy. Do you think she isn’t favored?”

Lin Dan wasn’t interested in whether Yan Langqing was favored or not, but she was curious about the Wanfu meat. She couldn’t help but ask, “How is the Wanfu meat made? Is it really that delicious?”

“I don’t know either. I’ve heard that when making Wanfu meat, Chef Yan insists that no one else be around, and the recipe is known only to her,” the handsome chef said with a regretful shake of his head.

Lin Dan’s expression remained unchanged, but her eyes were filled with coldness. She left her address and politely took her leave. As she exited the Qiaoyuan Restaurant, she immediately went to find the grocery store owner, pretending that she had gathered enough money and could proceed with the transfer. The owner indeed hesitated and said that after she left, someone else had offered a higher price to buy the shop.

Lin Dan carefully examined him, noticing the pained expression in his eyes, as though he regretted losing a good deal. There was no longer any doubt in her mind—the multiple buyers had been a ruse, and the Yan family had warned him not to sell the shop to anyone opening a Shandong restaurant.

After bidding the owner farewell, Lin Dan lost her interest in sightseeing and walked back without saying a word.

The handsome man watched her retreating figure, his voice a little low as he spoke, “I traveled in the northwest many years ago and only recently returned to the capital. I frequently have to go on trips, and I had no idea the Yan family’s methods had become so biased.”

“Biased?” Lin Dan turned around and smiled enigmatically.

Soon, the handsome man understood why she smiled that way. It seemed that the owner of the grocery store had learned about someone planning to open a Shandong restaurant across the street, intending to compete with the Yan family. Yan Shouye had sent someone to investigate, and since Lin Dan was powerless, the investigation led back to her. No matter where Lin Dan tried to open a shop, the Yan family sabotaged her efforts. No one in the West District dared to sell her a shop, and even the East District was out of the question. The seller of a shop in the North District went back on their word, causing Lin Dan to lose her deposit. After going around in circles, Lin Dan finally found a shop in the South District, located near a dock. The area was chaotic, with poor security, frequent robberies, and even murders. Doing business here was not about making money—it was about trying not to lose everything.

At last, the Yan family was satisfied, feeling that they had crushed Lin Dan and left her with no way to recover, so they stopped interfering.

The handsome man followed Lin Dan every day, watching her being bullied, excluded, and mistreated. He soon realized that the Yan family’s methods couldn’t just be described as “biased”—they were downright “vile.” Despite his strong will and steady temperament, a deep rage simmered within him. But Lin Dan always maintained an optimistic attitude. Whenever faced with difficulties, she only furrowed her brows for a moment before relaxing again, as if nothing could break her.

One day, Lin Dan went to the South District to organize her shop, and the handsome man stood at the door, his sharp eyes scanning the passersby, his aura commanding. Every evening, he would leave and return early the next morning, having breakfast at Lin Dan’s house before accompanying her on her errands. Thanks to his protection, Lin Dan was able to move around the chaotic South District with ease. She knew that without this bodyguard, she would have to hire some strong and reliable workers to guard the shop.

Thinking of this, Lin Dan sighed, “I’ve taken care of everything, so you don’t need to follow me anymore.”

The man didn’t address that directly but suggested again, “This shop’s location isn’t good. Let me get you one in the West District.”

“We met by chance and have no deep ties. How could I take your shop? I’ll always remember your help these days, and in the future, whenever you come to my restaurant, I’ll give you a fifty percent discount,” Lin Dan refused, as always. She wasn’t someone who didn’t understand gratitude, but she was not greedy or presumptuous either.

The man pressed his lips together, unsure of how to persuade her. Seeing that it was getting late, he turned to leave. When he reached the alleyway, he looked back with worry in his eyes. This was truly not a good place for a restaurant. The shop was tucked away in a winding alley, surrounded by gambling dens, cockfighting arenas, docks, and brothels. How could one do business here?

Lin Dan was so stubborn that the man didn’t know where to begin helping her.


============================


Chapter 17: The Female Chef (16)

The newly purchased shop was very cheap, costing less than twenty taels of silver, a far cry from the previous grocery store. However, every price has its pros and cons. The reason this shop was so inexpensive lay in its location.

For someone who wasn’t extremely familiar with the local terrain, it would be almost impossible to navigate the maze of alleys to find it. Qi Shi, who had almost gotten lost in the alleys, was now anxiously unable to eat, worried that her daughter would lose everything.

Lin Dan was tidying up the tables and chairs while comforting her. "Don’t worry, mother. There’s a reason I chose to open the shop here. Take a look at the shops around us, what do you see?"

"What do I see? Casinos, fighting arenas, docks, and brothels—places for the lowest of the low. The people passing by are also the lowest of the low. I really don’t understand why you chose this place. Since the people from the Yan family can’t tolerate us, we could just leave the capital and live a peaceful life. I don’t need you to fight for property or status, all I want is for you to live peacefully." Qi Shi said as she tried to grasp her daughter’s wrist.

Lin Dan patted her comfortingly and explained, "The residents in South City are mostly outsiders, their backgrounds are indeed complex, but it's still better than North City. Don’t look down on the people here—they’re like hidden dragons and crouching tigers, there are all sorts of people, it’s not a simple place. If we do business here, it’s much better than in North City. Look at the casinos, fighting arenas, docks, and brothels. Don’t they have crowds and bustling activity? That’s natural popularity. A restaurant’s success relies first on culinary skills, then on popularity. If the cooking is good and there’s enough foot traffic, business will naturally thrive. Once I get the business up and running, you’ll see."

"The foot traffic here is indeed not bad, but can your shop really benefit from it? Just walking through these alleys involves going around dozens of bends. Can people even find your shop? A restaurant should be on a main street. I’ve never seen anyone open a shop in a dead-end alley," Qi Shi still looked worried.

"Good wine is not afraid of a deep alley. This is not a big problem," Lin Dan said with a light smile, brushing it off.

Her servants worked swiftly and had the shop cleaned up in no time. They even hung a small flag at the entrance, so it was ready for business.

The handsome man had been delayed by something in the morning and only arrived around noon. He took care of the local troublemakers and called over the nearby constables to ensure they kept an eye on Lin Dan, before going to report at the shop. Naturally, all these things were done behind Lin Dan's back, so as not to burden her with worries.

"You’re here again? Don’t you have anything else to do?" Lin Dan was surprised when she saw the man.

"It seems you’ve never asked my name?" he replied with a question.

Lin Dan paused for a moment, then smiled lightly, "Alright then, may I ask what your name is, and how old are you?"

"I’m twenty-six, my surname is Tang, my given name is Jiu. You can call me Brother Tang Jiu, or just Jiu Ge," the man said, offering a respectful bow to Qi Shi, before picking up an axe to chop some firewood.

"Tang? That’s a good surname," Lin Dan smiled more brightly. As a chef, she naturally had a fondness for anything related to broths and soups.

The man thought for a moment and realized why she was smiling. His deep eyes softened a little. It was clear that Lin Dan could connect the dots even when just exchanging names, always thinking in terms of food.

The restaurant’s sign had already been commissioned from a carpenter and wouldn’t be ready until the afternoon, so Lin Dan didn’t intend to open for business today. She had her servants bring over three large pots for making soup—one for clear broth, one for milk soup, and one for braised broth. Since the shop was so cheap, she still had a lot of silver left, so she didn’t mind spending it, using whole chickens, ducks, hams, and pork bones to make her broths.

"I learned this technique of making soup from a master up north. Although he’s not a royal chef, his cooking skills are extraordinary. I studied under him for three years but only scratched the surface. The clear broth needs to be simmered on low heat, and the milk soup needs to be boiled with a vigorous fire. Be careful when adding firewood," Lin Dan said modestly, though her technique was masterful, moving through the steps of blanching, boiling, skimming, and simmering with graceful efficiency.

Tang Jiu looked at the large pots with a hint of concern. "With such rich ingredients, will you be able to recover the cost?"

Lin Dan smiled lightly. "Don’t let the amount of ingredients fool you. These broths are enough to make over a hundred dishes and bowls of noodles, without wasting anything. This shop is tucked away so deep, I need to simmer some old broths to draw customers in. As the saying goes, 'Good wine is not afraid of a deep alley.' Here, it’s 'Thick soup is not afraid of a deep alley.' Once the soup is ready, someone will surely come by because of the scent."

Once the clear and milk broths were simmering, Lin Dan added the spice bag to the braised broth and brought it to a boil with a strong fire. After boiling for a quarter of an hour, she added the ham, pork bones, pork belly, and pig skin. After it boiled again, she covered the pot, sealing it with a wet cloth to keep the steam in.

"This braised broth will be ready by tomorrow morning if we simmer it on low heat. You all rest now, just leave one person to watch the fire," Lin Dan said, clapping her hands to dismiss the servants. The merchant team still had to handle some dried goods business, so a few servants packed up and left the capital.

As Lin Dan was about to prepare lunch for her mother and Tang Jiu, suddenly, someone rushed into the shop. It was a waiter from Qiaoyuan Restaurant, looking quite angry. "So we finally found you, you fraud! Tell me, what kind of stuff did you sell to our restaurant? Why are you passing off inferior goods as high-quality ones?"

"Younger brother, don’t be in such a hurry. We can discuss this back at Qiaoyuan Restaurant," Lin Dan, far from being angry, calmly poured a cup of hot tea for the waiter.

The waiter had come to confront her, but when he tried to grab her, he was met with a cold stare from Tang Jiu and hesitated, eventually inviting her back with much politeness. The fair-skinned, handsome young chef had been waiting in the shop. Despite being the victim, he had the audacity to speak in a soft tone, "The ingredients you sold to me seem to be problematic. They don’t taste like top-quality ingredients. Try this. This dish was made with the wide stomach you sold to me, and this one was from Yan’s restaurant. They’re both made from the same seafood, but why does the taste differ so much?"

Lin Dan tasted both dishes and couldn’t help but laugh. She had been struggling to find a way to counter Yan’s family, and now this young chef had handed her the perfect opportunity. Fine, she couldn’t directly compete with them, but others would step in for her.

Thinking this, she waved her hand and said, "Go to the kitchen. Let me see how you’re cooking. I’ve carefully chosen every single piece of dried goods, they are top-notch, and there’s absolutely no problem with them. If the ingredients aren’t the issue, then it must be your cooking technique. Let’s figure out the source of the problem."

The young chef, without hesitation, agreed and walked to the kitchen, his movements obedient and impeccable. The old shopkeeper gave Lin Dan a glare, seemingly wanting to scold her for her impolite behavior, but refrained when he saw Tang Jiu’s menacing aura. The group headed to the kitchen to begin cooking.

Lin Dan observed the young chef for a while, then shook her head. "Your basics are solid, but you lack some experience. When cooking with dried goods, seventy percent of the effort is in soaking them, and thirty percent is in seasoning. Your soaking skills are lacking, so naturally, you can’t make good dishes."

"Take this sea cucumber, for example. Simply soaking it in water is not enough. If you just cut it into pieces and stir-fry, it can barely be used. But if you use the whole sea cucumber in a dish, some parts will be soft while others will be tough, resulting in uneven texture and poor absorption of flavor. Let me teach you a secret method. Before soaking the sea cucumber in water, it’s best to roast it on a hot iron plate. Use low heat to char the outer skin, then scrape off the blackened skin with a small knife before boiling it. Why is this necessary? Because the freshly bought dry sea cucumbers still contain some moisture, and only by thoroughly removing this moisture will the texture become even. You should boil it three times and let it cool three times. Only then will it be fully rehydrated. When you squeeze it, it will leave an indentation, and the texture will be tender and smooth."

As she explained, she skillfully worked with the sea cucumber, her hands moving gracefully, leaving the others in awe. The young chef only then realized—this Lin shopkeeper was not just a seller of dried goods, but also an incredibly experienced chef. The method she used to rehydrate the sea cucumber was so advanced that it would take at least three to five years of practice to figure out the key techniques. Yet, not only did she know them, but she also generously shared her knowledge, showing exemplary character and integrity.

Eager to learn more, the young chef quickly took over the task of rehydrating the sea cucumber.

Lin Dan wiped her hands with a cloth and continued working on the fish belly, explaining as she heated the oil: "Your dried fish belly isn’t rehydrated properly either. It needs to be soaked in oil to achieve a smooth and tender texture. First, soak it in oil at half the heat twice, then let it cool. Afterward, fry it gently over a low flame, remove it, and soak it in clean water to absorb moisture. Next, place it in lye water and continually tap it to remove the oil, then rinse away the bitter taste of the lye. Only then is it ready to be used in cooking. When fish belly is rehydrated with oil, its texture is soft, smooth, and delicate, and it remains delicious no matter how you prepare it. Not only top-grade fish belly but even the poorest-quality fish belly can be turned into a delicacy."

As she spoke, Lin Dan continued working, and before long, she had prepared the oil and added the fish belly. A chef’s true skill is revealed when they are at the stove. The young chef watched her, his eyes growing brighter as if he had discovered a treasure.

While waiting for the oil to cool, Lin Dan continued, "Look at these rock ears. They’re not rehydrated properly either. Boiling water isn’t enough. You need to soak them with a bit of coarse salt to soften them and remove the fuzz from the back..."

"Yes, yes, you're right! Shopkeeper Lin, I was wrong before. Please forgive me this time. My cooking skills are poor, and I beg you to teach me! Not long ago, the Yan family restaurant introduced a new dish, squirrel-shaped mandarin fish. Its appearance and taste are outstanding, and they've already stolen almost all of my remaining customers. If I don’t improve, my 'Imperial Cuisine' restaurant’s reputation will be ruined!" The young chef clasped his hands together and bowed deeply to Lin Dan. To be honest, based on her technique for rehydrating ingredients, Lin Dan was no less skilled than his father or grandfather. She would make an excellent mentor.

==========================================

Chapter 18: The Cook's Apprentice (Part 17)

Lin Dan soaked a bowl of rock ears with coarse salt and instructed her assistant to continue soaking the remaining dried goods using her method. Then, she turned to the young chef and said slowly, "Seeing your sincerity in admitting your mistake, I will teach you a signature dish."

"Ah, what did you say?" The young chef looked at Lin Dan, bewildered, doubting he had heard her correctly. It was already a big deal that Shopkeeper Lin was willing to teach him some secret methods for handling ingredients, but now she was offering to teach him her signature dish? A signature dish was a chef's trump card, something they rarely showed to others!

"You didn’t hear wrong. I’ll teach you a signature dish, but you need to pay close attention," Lin Dan said as she fished out a lively carp from the bucket and placed it on the cutting board, stunning it with a swift blow.

Tang Jiu glanced at her, then at the confused young chef, and a gleam of interest flashed in his eyes.

"Shopkeeper Lin, wait! I’ll grab paper and pen!" The young chef saw that Lin Dan was serious, so he quickly ran to the front hall, grabbed a stack of paper and a calligraphy brush, and started writing down—select a Yellow River carp weighing 3 to 4 pounds...

"Got it?" Lin Dan held a kitchen knife in one hand and the large carp in the other, smiling and waiting for the young chef. She appreciated those who were diligent and eager to learn; a little clumsiness didn’t matter.

"Got it, got it! Please continue, Shopkeeper Lin!" The young chef nodded eagerly, his attitude respectful. The old shopkeeper, who had long been impressed with Lin Dan, was already squeezed beside Tang Jiu, his eyes fixed on the cutting board.

Lin Dan continued, "I’ve also tasted the squirrel-shaped mandarin fish from the Yan family restaurant. Its sweet and sour flavor, with a tender texture, is indeed excellent. The dish I’m going to teach you today has an even better flavor, also a sweet-sour dish, called Golden Lion Fish."

One dish is named after a squirrel, and the other after a golden lion. The names alone are already competitive—are you sure this isn’t a battle? The young chef thought to himself, but soon, Lin Dan’s extraordinary knife skills made him forget everything else. In just a few swift motions, she cleaned the fish, then sliced the flesh into thin pieces, cutting from the tail toward the head, making shallow cuts at first and deeper ones toward the end. Each slice was smooth, continuous, and in no time, the large carp was cut into a lotus-like shape. Lifting the tail and shaking it, the pale, pink "petals" unfolded beautifully, creating a stunning visual effect.

The young chef initially thought this knife skill was impressive enough, but then Lin Dan took out a pair of scissors and cut the fish petals into strips, each strip about six or seven pieces. She then stacked them again. The fishbone from head to tail was covered with strips of fish meat, creating a unique and intricate shape. The fish was now sliced so finely, how would it hold up when cooked? Would it fall apart into mush with just a spoon?

The young chef continued to take notes while worrying, but soon saw Lin Dan preparing a batter with six egg yolks, half a pound of starch, and four ounces of flour. She added water, stirring it into a thick, golden mixture that could hold a bit in your hand, stretching into strands.

"When making the batter, only use egg yolks, not egg whites, to get a better color. Use water starch, not dry starch, or the fish will get fuzz. Water starch ensures the fish has a delicate, smooth texture," Lin Dan briefly explained. She held the fish head in one hand and the tail in the other, dipping the lotus-like fish into the batter to coat it evenly. When lifted, the fish strips stuck together in strands, dripping with batter. The presentation wasn’t great at first, but after deep-frying, the fish strips would open up, standing upright like a golden lion’s mane.

As the young chef and the old shopkeeper marveled, Lin Dan continued explaining, "When the fish strips are fully submerged in oil, you need to shake them three times to spread them out. After shaking, pull down the fish head and lift the tail slightly, bringing the strips closer to the head to form the shape of a golden lion. This is the key to shaping. As the fish goes into the hot oil, the temperature will drop. When it reaches about 60% heat, turn the heat up high and fry it quickly to set the shape. Then you can let go, and fry the head and tail, flipping them with a slotted spoon. Continue frying until golden and crispy, then drizzle the sauce."

Although Lin Dan made it sound easy, in reality, it was quite difficult. Just slicing the fish and turning it into strips required impressive knife skills. The battering and frying techniques were even more challenging, with seasoning being the easiest part. While frying, the chef’s hands had to hold the fish head and tail firmly, keeping them close to the bubbling oil, making sure the fish strips were fully submerged and crisped. This high temperature could burn the skin off one’s hands. If the fish was thrown into the oil too early, the dish would be ruined.

The young chef carefully observed Lin Dan’s hands and saw the thick calluses on her fingertips, a sign of the countless high-temperature fryings she had endured to perfect this skill! She shook the fish strips gently, her face showing no pain, only patience and focus.

Once the entire fish was fried, she instructed the young chef while taking out a clean pot and pouring in some vegetable oil. "Once the fish is golden, take it out and place it belly-side down on a plate. I’ll make the sauce."

While speaking, the oil was ready, and Lin Dan crushed a lime and a tomato with a large spoon. She added white sugar, white vinegar, and water, simmering it into a thick sweet-and-sour sauce. After thickening, she evenly drizzled it over the fluffy, crispy fish strips. A Golden Lion Fish was now ready.

The sweet and sour aroma instantly filled the air, making everyone involuntarily salivate. This dish not only smelled powerful but looked equally commanding, resembling a lion’s wild mane, giving off an impression of fierceness.

"Wow, it smells so good!" The young chef gulped, saliva dripping.

"Can we taste it?" Tang Jiu's gaze was fixed on Lin Dan. He was typically reserved, but seeing this dish, his nature became somewhat greedy and eager.

"Go ahead and taste it," Lin Dan said, wiping her sweat with a towel.

The young chef and Tang Jiu immediately picked up their chopsticks, ready to dig in, when suddenly, the old shopkeeper, who had run out earlier, came rushing back in, saying in a hurry, "You can’t eat it yet! Prince Cheng is here and specifically requested to taste this dish you just made! Quickly, Xiao Douzi, take this dish out and don’t keep the prince waiting!"

The waiter squeezed through under Tang Jiu’s arm, grabbed the plate, and ran out.

Lin Dan was so immersed in cooking that she didn’t realize her sauce’s aroma had wafted out of the window and into the street. Prince Cheng, like Yongding Marquis, was a renowned gourmet in the capital, and his greatest passion was tasting delicious food. He had often been a regular at the Qiaoyuan restaurant, but after the young chef’s father passed, he had visited less frequently.

That day, he had originally planned to go to the Yan family restaurant for lunch. However, as he passed by Qiaoyuan restaurant, one of his attendants had received a bribe from the old shopkeeper and casually mentioned that Qiaoyuan had a new batch of premium seafood. Prince Cheng thought he would give it a try, so he agreed to visit.

But just then, another carriage arrived, and Marquis Gong’s head popped out of the window, joking, "Your Highness, don’t fall for it. I was tricked in the same way yesterday, and the food was terrible. That chef Cui’s skills are subpar, and the taste of the top-grade seafood doesn’t compare to Yan’s restaurant!"

Prince Cheng glared at the attendant and was about to leave when suddenly, a tantalizing scent wafted by. It was sweet, sour, and then gradually merged with the freshness of the fish and the richness of the oil. It was absolutely intoxicating!

"What is that smell? Smell it! Quickly, smell it!" Prince Cheng jumped up, sticking his head out of the carriage window, sniffing like a dog.

Marquis Gong stopped talking, hurriedly closing his mouth and swallowing his saliva, which had been flowing uncontrollably.

The servant, who was caught off guard by the exposed intentions, quickly said, "Your Highness, the fragrance is coming from the Qiaoyuan restaurant. Perhaps Chef Qiu is preparing a dish."

"Let's go in and have a look!" Prince Cheng couldn't sit still. He immediately jumped out of the carriage, hurried a few steps into the restaurant, and shouted loudly, "Where is everyone? What are they cooking in the kitchen? Quickly, bring it to me!"

The waiter quickly settled him down and then dashed to the back kitchen, explaining the situation to the old shopkeeper. Only then did the old shopkeeper save the dish from the small cook and Tang Jiu's hands, hurrying to bring it to the front.

Prince Gong had already lost faith in Qiu's cuisine and originally planned to just watch the commotion from the carriage. However, as soon as the dish was served, he couldn't resist. He quickly withdrew his head, stood up, and ran toward the table, but in his haste, he bumped his head on the carriage roof, feeling a bit dizzy. After finally covering his head and running to the table, he looked at the dish and gasped. Prince Cheng also widened his eyes, his face full of astonishment.

They had thought that the squirrel mandarin fish from the Yan family restaurant was a perfect combination of knife skills, presentation, color, and flavor, but as soon as this dish appeared, it instantly shattered the myth of Yan's restaurant.

The fish, cut into fine strands, stood upright and gathered towards the fish head, with a uniquely beautiful and distinctive presentation. When the chopsticks pierced the crispy outer layer of the fish strands, revealing the pale pink fish meat inside, the shimmering oil and the ruby-red thick sauce mixed together. The freshness, tenderness, crispness, sourness, and sweetness exploded on the tongue in a perfect symphony of flavors that was beyond words!

Prince Cheng carefully snapped a "lion's mane," quickly stuffed it into his mouth, and instantly narrowed his eyes. The wrinkles on his face smoothed out visibly, making him look several years younger.

"How does it taste?" Prince Gong eagerly pulled his sleeve.

Prince Cheng ignored him, snapped another "lion's mane," and savored it carefully. He kept shaking his head and smacking his lips, looking quite smug.

"Hey, at least say something! I can't believe you!" Prince Gong rolled up his sleeves and scolded, "Waiter, are you blind? Don't you see I'm here too? Why aren't you bringing more bowls and chopsticks? Hurry up!"

If the waiter didn't bring them soon, he was going to grab them himself!

The waiter scrambled to bring the utensils, and saw that the two noble princes almost fought over the table. The two pairs of chopsticks were locked in a battle—each trying to take the food, neither giving in, and both grumbling, "Old Six, get lost, this dish is mine, you don’t get any!"

"Your Highness, you’re being unreasonable! We’re brothers, what’s wrong with sharing a dish?"

"Why don’t you order one for yourself if you want some?"

"If I order another, we’ll have to wait forever! I can’t sit still once I smell this aroma!"

Seeing this, the waiter had no choice but to rush back to the kitchen and ask the shopkeeper to quickly prepare another golden lion fish. Otherwise, the two princes would really end up fighting.

Lin Dan was neither flattered nor nervous. She slowly rolled up her sleeves and calmly said, "Since that’s the case, I’ll help you to the end and show you another trick."


===================================================
Chapter 19: The Chef (18)

The two princes were enjoying the Golden Lion Fish together, and clearly making another dish of the same kind would be redundant. Lin Dan didn’t pay attention to the waiter who kept urging her; instead, she selected some fresh kidney slices, made beautiful decorative cuts resembling wheat ears, quickly stir-fried them to create a floral shape, then made a thick sesame paste sauce with sesame paste, peanut butter, red oil, vinegar, sugar, and other seasonings, and poured it over the kidney slices. As she worked, she explained, "When making the sauce, water, oil, sesame paste, and peanut butter must be whipped together. Only when they are thoroughly mixed will the sauce cling to the kidney slices without dripping. See here?"

She picked up a slice of the kidney to show everyone, indicating they should observe carefully. The kidney slice was covered with a thick and rich sauce. Without even tasting it, just the appearance suggested its deliciousness. Despite the thickness of the sauce, it clung to the kidney slice without dripping a drop, preserving the texture and flavor of the kidney to a great extent.

Chef Qiu observed this closely and quickly jotted down the key points of the dish.

"Serve it out," Lin Dan said, washing the pot clean and continuing to prepare the next dish. The two princes were of high status, and since they were already eating, making them wait for each dish one by one would not be practical. She needed to choose a few simple and quick-to-cook dishes to quickly put together a banquet that would look good and allow the guests to eat comfortably.

Many dried ingredients hadn’t been properly soaked yet and couldn’t be used, so Lin Dan went to check the water tank and found several live sea cucumbers and abalones. She quickly took them out and cleaned them.

"Next, I’ll make a cold dish with live sea cucumbers. Do you have ice cubes in your restaurant? If you do, send some over," she said, while swiftly handling the sea cucumbers.

"Yes, yes, yes! Zhou Fu, hurry and bring some ice cubes from the cellar!" Chef Qiu turned to instruct the helper. The helpers had all stopped working when Lin Dan started rehydrating the sea cucumbers, their eyes fixed on her. It was a rare opportunity to learn secret techniques from a top chef.

Zhou Fu ran to the cellar, fearing that while he wasn’t there, the shopkeeper might teach some secret tricks that he would miss.

Lin Dan cut open the live sea cucumbers, removed their innards, cleaned them, and then sliced them into thin strips. As she worked, she explained, "Processing live sea cucumbers is tricky. The challenge lies in controlling the heat. If the heat is too high, the sea cucumber will be overcooked and tough; if the heat is too low, it won’t be cooked properly and will taste fishy. I’ll teach you a method: When the water is just about to boil, dip your finger in. If your finger can only stay in the water for a moment and feels a sharp burning sensation when you pull it out, that’s the right temperature. After cooking the sea cucumber, putting it in cold water will soften it and affect the texture. So we cook it again and then freeze it in ice water. The texture will tighten quickly, giving it a soft outer layer and chewy inner texture, perfect for cold dishes."

She placed the cooked sea cucumber in ice water and prepared a dressing by combining finely chopped fresh chilies, green onions, garlic, light soy sauce, fragrant vinegar, and sesame oil to create a glossy brown sauce, which she poured over the chilled sea cucumber strips.

Chef Qiu immediately grabbed a pair of chopsticks and tasted it, while Tang Jiu, under the old shopkeeper’s watchful eye, tried a bit too. His narrow, eagle-like eyes immediately lit up. The flavor of the cold sea cucumber was absolutely amazing—its original fishy taste was completely gone, replaced with an intense freshness. The texture was crunchy and chewy, with just a hint of softness, and the outer layer absorbed the sour and spicy dressing, creating an indescribable flavor.

Chef Qiu regretted trying it. He wished he hadn’t taken that bite because now he could not bear to see it taken away when the waiter served it to the guests.

Tang Jiu’s sharp eyes were fixed on the waiter, sending a chill down their spine. The waiter wished they could sneak along the wall.

Lin Dan then took out the abalones and continued her explanation: "Live abalones don’t have the same springy texture as dried ones, but I have a method to give them the flavor of dried abalones. It’s called the sugar water treatment. First, freeze the live abalones in ice to set their shape, then soak them in sugar water. After soaking, the black membrane on the abalone can easily be brushed off."

She held the abalone soaked in sugar water in her hand and gently scrubbed it. Sure enough, the black membrane came off completely, revealing the tender white abalone meat, which looked stunning.

"After cleaning the live abalones, cook them in their shells, then remove the shells and prepare the meat. This method of cooking live abalones results in a soft, chewy texture that rivals that of dried abalones. The dish I’m making now is braised live abalone. I add some fine salt, sugar, cooking wine, and broth, simmering it on low heat for a while, then adding dark soy sauce to turn it a rich red, before thickening the sauce over high heat. Let me scoop one out for you to taste."

Lin Dan took out an abalone and placed it on a small dish, leaving the rest for the waiter to take away. The crowd immediately surged forward to taste it, but Tang Jiu pushed them aside. With his skills, he almost devoured half of the abalone, his face showing utter satisfaction.

After preparing a few savory dishes, Lin Dan placed a clean monkey head mushroom into milk-white soy milk and simmered it until half-cooked, then transferred it to bone broth to continue simmering. She added different seasonings at different stages, gradually turning the milk soup into a red broth. When the monkey head mushroom became tender and collapsed into irregular, brain-like grooves, she carefully scooped it out with a slotted spoon and thickened the broth.

When the waiter came to serve the dish, he was stunned and puzzled. "We haven’t had monkey brains in the restaurant for a long time. Where did this ‘red-braised monkey brain’ come from?"

"This dish is called Red Braised Monkey Head, made from monkey head mushrooms. First, soy milk is used to neutralize the fishy taste, then bone broth adds a rich, marrow-like flavor, and finally, the red broth enhances the meat flavor. The three broths give it not only the fresh taste of the mushroom but also a slight fishy and meaty flavor, almost indistinguishable from real monkey brains."

Despite how simple Lin Dan made it sound, the actual process was much more complicated. Knowing when to add each ingredient, when to change the broth, when to remove it from the heat—all were crucial details. If one step was wrong, the flavor would be ruined; if the heat was even slightly off, the mushroom would break apart. Every small detail reflected deep expertise.

The crowd, even after watching Lin Dan prepare the dish, could not grasp the key points. This was the mark of a top chef. Unless she revealed the secret, even if they watched it a hundred times, they would never learn. As the saying goes, "The spoon controls the universe, and the fire tempers real gold."

Tang Jiu, as usual, reached for his chopsticks to take a piece of the monkey head mushroom, but Lin Dan blocked him with her long spoon. "Please take it easy, big brother. I worked hard to create the monkey brain shape, and if you poke it with your chopsticks, it’ll be ruined. How will the guests eat it?"

Tang Jiu reluctantly put down his chopsticks, but the aroma of the red-braised monkey head mushroom lingered in the air, tempting him. Unable to resist, he sneaked to the front hall, thinking to himself that if he couldn’t eat it, he’d at least watch others enjoy it. But soon, he realized that watching others eat was far crueler than not eating at all.

The once-empty front hall was now filled with customers, all drawn in by the delicacies on the table of the two princes. The waiter asked what they wanted to order, and they pointed to the table and urged, "Bring us exactly what Prince Cheng is having, just like it is, quickly!"

The air was filled with all kinds of delicious aromas, making everyone salivate.

But that wasn’t all. While eating, Prince Cheng loudly commented on the dishes, his voice carrying across the room: "Wow, this cold sea cucumber is so fresh! The texture is crisp and smooth, truly a unique taste! Getting this texture just right isn’t easy—if the heat is too high, it’ll be tough; too low, and it’ll be fishy. This is just perfect!" He gave a thumbs-up as he spoke.

Prince Gong quickly grabbed some food while Prince Cheng was talking, his mouth full of food.

"Is this dried abalone or live abalone? The flavor is so strong, it must be live abalone. But it’s so soft and chewy, it could be dried abalone. Wait, I can’t tell!" Prince Cheng chewed thoughtfully.

The waiter bowed and replied, "Your Highness, this dish uses live abalone, and the method of preparation is quite special, which gives it a unique flavor."

Prince Cheng shook his head. "This isn’t just unique; this is extremely unique! I’ve had so many abalones, but this flavor is the best—it perfectly combines the advantages of both dried and live abalones!"

Prince Gong remained silent, focusing on his food.

"Braised monkey brain?" When they reached the last dish, Prince Cheng was fully satisfied. "Since the famine in the south, I haven’t had braised monkey brain in months. This is full of flavor—the red oil broth has soaked into the brain matter. When you bite into it, juice bursts out from between your teeth. The slight fishiness mixes with the fresh taste—it’s absolutely incredible!"

He slapped away the spoon that Prince Gong tried to reach for and hugged the entire dish to himself.

The waiter cautiously explained, "Your Highness, this dish is not monkey brain; it's made from monkey head mushrooms. Would you care to try again?"

"Huh, it's made from monkey head mushrooms?" Prince Cheng was stunned. He tasted it again and again but couldn't detect anything unusual. "No, this can't be! I've eaten dozens, if not hundreds, of monkey brains. How could I not tell the difference? This is definitely a dish made from monkey brain, the freshest, just cracked open and taken out. Don’t try to fool me!"

"I’m really not fooling you; it’s made from monkey head mushrooms," the waiter said, both amused and exasperated.

Prince Cheng stopped speaking, sidestepping his younger brother, who was once again trying to steal food. He quickly finished the monkey head mushrooms, wiped his mouth, and sighed, "Whether it's monkey brain or monkey head mushrooms, I love this flavor! To be able to make a vegetarian dish taste like a meat dish, and so full of flavor, so unique, the chef’s skill is truly..."

Prince Cheng raised his left thumb, then his right thumb, and brought them together to show his admiration for the pinnacle of perfection.

"This is no worse than the imperial chefs in the palace!" Prince Gong genuinely praised.

More and more customers were drawn in by the feast on the royal table. The restaurant became lively and bustling, just like in its glorious days. The old manager watched with tears nearly spilling from his eyes, thinking to himself that no matter what, he had to keep Manager Lin—she was the treasure of the establishment!


========================================================

Chapter 20: The Cook (19)

Lin Dan had her own restaurant to open, so of course, she could not stay. After preparing ten tables of dishes, seeing that the meal hours were almost over, she washed her hands and face, ready to leave. The dried ingredients she had prepared using her secret method were now ready to be used, and although Chef Qiu had only learned a little about cooking, he had managed to create a delicious dish, earning unanimous praise from everyone.

As Lin Dan was about to leave, Chef Qiu handed her two recipe cards, expressing his gratitude, "Lin Shopkeeper, these are my Qiu family's secret recipes. Please accept them." He had originally planned to buy Lin Dan's signature dish with silver but thought that she might not be impressed, so he decided to exchange goods instead, which felt more sincere.

Lin Dan initially thought the two pieces of paper were silver notes and was about to decline, but after hearing him clearly, she quickly accepted them. Glancing over them briefly, her tone softened, "Thank you. I will come daily at the hour of Wei to teach you how to make Golden Lion Fish, and leave by the hour of Shen, until you’ve learned it. If the Yan Family restaurant comes out with new signature dishes, I’ll teach you another one, and I’ll teach it until you’ve mastered it. Whatever they make, I’ll teach you, and I guarantee you’ll learn it."

Chef Qiu looked at her in disbelief and speculated, "Lin Shopkeeper, do you have a grudge with the Yan Family restaurant?"

"I originally wanted to open a Shandong restaurant across from the Yan Family’s restaurant, but they maliciously sabotaged my plans. What do you think, do I have a grudge or not?"

"Well, it's a good thing they sabotaged your plans, or they would’ve taken all the business on the street!" Chef Qiu, being blunt, said this, then immediately realized his mistake and mentally shouted, "Oh no!" He looked at Lin Dan apologetically.

Lin Dan pointed at him with a faint smile, saying, "I’ll take that as a compliment. If anyone asks, just tell them you have a teacher, but don’t mention my name." With that, she walked out through the back door.

Chef Qiu quickly agreed. He knew well that the Yan Family was unscrupulous and often used underhanded competition tactics. But no matter how sneaky they were, one thing was certain—cooking couldn't be faked. A dish was either good or bad, and customers could tell the difference. It wasn't something that could be easily deceived.

He hid behind the screen to observe the situation in the front room and saw that the two princes were preparing to leave. They even had the remaining dishes packed to go. Royalty was known for their extravagance, and seeing them take care with every grain of rice was rare.

"I have to meet this new chef and ask her how she made that monkey head mushroom dish. Little Qiu could never make something like that," Prince Cheng said, changing his mind as he reached the door, instructing the old shopkeeper to bring the chef out.

Chef Qiu had no choice but to go out and apologize, saying that the chef had already left and wouldn't return until tomorrow afternoon. Moreover, she wouldn’t be cooking regularly at the Qiao Garden restaurant, it would depend on luck.

"When will she come?" Prince Cheng relentlessly pressed.

"She comes at the hour of Wei and leaves at the hour of Shen."

"By the hour of Wei, the meal time is already over!"

"She only comes to teach me cooking, not to be the head chef at Qiao Garden restaurant," Chef Qiu answered carefully.

"Never mind, never mind, it’s fine if the meal time is over. I’ll just delay lunch. The hour of Wei, you said? I’ll come again tomorrow!" Prince Cheng said, holding a food box and walking out with his belly sticking out. The other diners eavesdropped, all making plans to return tomorrow at the hour of Wei. Good food was worth the wait; if it was later, so be it.

Chef Qiu respectfully saw the two princes off, and as he glanced around, he noticed the manager of the Yan Family restaurant secretly watching the situation from around the corner. Meanwhile, the Yan Family restaurant was desolate, with hardly any customers.

Chef Qiu sneered, feeling the weight in his heart that had been suspended since his father's death finally settle.

...

When Lin Dan and Tang Jiu returned to the South City, it was already evening. The sky was filled with fiery clouds, casting a warm red glow on their faces, creating a peaceful and serene atmosphere. Neither of them spoke; they walked quietly, one after the other, until they reached their restaurant. There, they saw a flamboyantly dressed middle-aged woman talking to Xiaozhu, occasionally touching him in a flirtatious manner.

When Xiaozhu saw Lin Dan, he finally sighed with relief and hurriedly said, "Our shopkeeper is here. You can talk to her!" With that, he quickly ran off, as if something were chasing him.

The middle-aged woman smiled at Xiaozhu’s retreating figure, then turned to Lin Dan and said, "I’ll give you ten taels of silver if you sell me this shop." Before Lin Dan could respond, she continued, "I’ve heard that you bought this shop for twenty taels. You wouldn’t want to sell it for just ten, but you must consider this—your shop is hidden deep in an alley, who can find it? If you sell it now, you can still save some of your fortune. Waiting until later, and you’ll likely lose everything."

"Sell it to you? Aren’t you afraid of losing money?" Lin Dan walked over slowly.

"I’m in the flesh trade; can you compare to me? As long as my girls spread their legs, my customers know where to go. Unlike you, who has a shop hidden here—who can even find it?" The middle-aged woman spoke rudely, and even Lin Dan, with her good temper, couldn’t help but frown.

Tang Jiu stepped forward to throw her out, but Lin Dan gently tugged at his sleeve. She spoke softly, "Sorry, I’m not selling this shop. Please look elsewhere." No matter how rude the other party was, Lin Dan remained calm. Business was about peaceful cooperation, and she never let her emotions be swayed by others.

The middle-aged woman seemed to be intimidated by Tang Jiu’s fierce gaze, and quickly walked out. After a few steps, she turned back and called, "I have a brothel right at the end of this street called Cuihong House. If you change your mind, come find me. I’m Qin Erniang. But let me warn you, I won’t offer such a high price if you wait too long!" She had two beautiful courtesans from Jiangnan, and her plan was to keep them in a secluded alley, renting them out as mistresses for more profit. Lin Dan’s place was serene and quiet, which she had set her sights on, but it was a pity Lin Dan was unwilling to sell.

"Well, if you won’t sell, that’s your choice. Running a restaurant in a secluded alley won’t bring you any profits!" With that, Qin Erniang finally felt relieved, satisfied that Lin Dan would eventually come to her to beg.

Lin Dan didn’t take her words to heart, just smiling lightly as she walked in. Tang Jiu, however, looked worried. "Why don’t you open a shop in the West City? I have a few shops there that I can sell or rent to you. The Yan Family wouldn’t dare to make trouble."

"Thank you for your kindness," Lin Dan turned to look at him, her voice soft, "Tang Jiu, what do you think is the best dish in the world?"

This question puzzled the seasoned gourmet Tang Jiu. He had traveled all over, tasting all sorts of flavors, but if he had to rank them, he couldn’t. Each cuisine had its own strengths and appeal, and there were always people who loved it. Even royal cuisine wasn’t universally adored—some praised it, while others criticized it. It was truly a matter of personal taste.

Seeing that he hadn’t answered for a while, Lin Dan pointed to the signboard above the door and said, "I can make the most delicious dishes in the world, so why would I worry about others?"

Tang Jiu looked up and immediately understood. The newly installed signboard displayed three big characters in regular script—Home-style Cuisine. Without a doubt, this was the most delicious food in the world. No matter where you went or what exquisite dishes you tasted, the flavor that you most longed for in the quiet moments of the night, in a distant land, was always the taste of home, the connection to one's roots. Especially in South City, where everyone was an outsider, the more people were used to flavors from the capital, the more they missed the taste of their hometown.

Lin Dan had spent ten years traveling the Great Chu Kingdom, learning authentic folk recipes. Opening this restaurant was never going to be a loss.

Once Tang Jiu understood, Lin Dan smiled lightly, "If it were in the West City, I’d open a Shandong restaurant; in the East City, I’d open a Huaiyang restaurant; in the North City, I’d open a noodle shop. Wherever I open, I’ll always have business." Because she trusted in her skills, she faced everything with confidence and ease.

The West City was home to officials, so a Shandong restaurant, known for official dishes, would thrive. The East City was home to wealthy people, who loved luxury and refinement, so a Huaiyang restaurant would be perfect. Huaiyang cuisine focused on elegance, balanced flavors, and often came with a story behind every dish, appealing to the wealthy. The North City, full of common folk, would need just a small noodle shop, selling simple noodles like plain or stir-fried noodles, still making a profit. As for the South City, with her home-style cuisine, Lin Dan had nothing to worry about.

Tang Jiu walked, deep in thought about these business strategies, gaining a greater understanding of Lin Dan.

"It seems I was worrying for nothing," he sighed with a complex tone.

"Still, I appreciate your kind offer." Lin Dan walked into the kitchen, moved the three pots of soup into large earthenware jars, and continued to simmer them on low heat. She then picked up a kitchen knife and began to cut the cabbage stalks. Using different knife skills, she cut the stalks into various shapes—centipede cuts, peony cuts, and wheat ear cuts. After putting them into the water, they slowly unfurled, each in its own unique way.

Tang Jiu stared at her masterful knife skills for a long time before pointing to the frying pan filled with sand and asking, "Are you preparing to make candied chestnuts?"

Lin Dan shook her head. "After practicing my knife skills, I still need to practice flipping the wok. Without some weight in the pan, how can I build up my wrist strength? If I don't practice for a day, my knife skills will become dull, and my strength will wane. When I get to the stove, I won't be able to make the same flavor as before."

Tang Jiu couldn't help but sigh, "Practicing cooking is no easier than practicing martial arts."

"Every craft is honed through practice; it’s nothing special," Lin Dan said as she put down the knife, walked into the kitchen, and opened the lid of the large earthenware pot where she had been simmering the seasoning sauce. Using a long spoon, she slowly stirred, then took out the cooked whole chicken, whole duck, pig's trotters, and pork belly. She added fresh whole chicken, whole duck, pig's trotters, pork belly, and pig skin into the pot and continued to simmer. Finally, she covered the pot, sealed the gaps with a damp towel, and placed a stone slab on top to prevent any flavors from escaping.

As the lid was lifted, Tang Jiu nearly fainted from the intoxicating aroma—not because it was foul, but because it was so deliciously fragrant, it was simply soul-stirring!


====================================






























